Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
1. Introduction
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
5. Data Retention
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
7. Security
8. Minors
9. Data Transfers
10. Who is my data controller?
11. Your rights
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
13. Information specific to other services
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
Privacy Notice
Versions:
December 5, 2024 (current)
November 7, 2024
July 15, 2024
February 15, 2024
November 1, 2023
September 22, 2023
August 1, 2023
June 15, 2023
October 10, 2022
August 16, 2021
July 1, 2021
November 2, 2020
August 6, 2020
July 7, 2020
November 20, 2019
September 26, 2019
January 2, 2019
April 11, 2018
LAST UPDATED: December 5, 2024
1. Introduction
1.1 Scope
This Privacy Notice applies to all the products, services, websites and apps offered by  SurveyMonkey Inc., SurveyMonkey Europe UC, SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda., SurveyMonkey Netherlands B.V., and other SurveyMonkey affiliates (collectively “SurveyMonkey”), except where otherwise noted. The services include SurveyMonkey, SurveyMonkey Apply, SurveyMonkey Audience, SurveyMonkey Rewards, SurveyMonkey Contribute, Wufoo, TechValidate, GetFeedback Direct, and GetFeedback Digital. We refer to those products, services, websites, and apps collectively as the “services” in this Privacy Notice. Unless otherwise noted in your contract, our services are provided by SurveyMonkey Inc. inside of the United States, by SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda. inside of Brazil, and by SurveyMonkey Europe UC everywhere else.
US residents: Please visit our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
for more information on our privacy practices specific to individual states.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees or job applicants in their capacity as employees or candidates. Employees and candidates should refer to our Employee Privacy Notice or
Candidate Privacy Notice
, respectively.
1.2
Quick Links
If you want to identify your data controller please see the “
Who is my data controller?
” section below.
For a quick snapshot of how SurveyMonkey treats personal information see our
Privacy Basics
.
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
2.1 What do we mean by 'Personal Data'?
References in this Privacy Notice to data, personal information, or information, are all references to Personal Data. Personal Data means information relating to a living individual (a "Data Subject") who is, or can be, reasonably identified from the information, either alone or in conjunction with other information.
2.2 Who do we collect data about?
We group consumers or businesses into the following categories:
Creator
: the business or consumer that holds an account within a SurveyMonkey service that either directly creates surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires or that can collaborate, commenting, or review surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires within an account.
Respondent
: the individual that receives a survey, form, application, or questionnaire powered by a SurveyMonkey service.
Panelist
: the individual that uses Contribute or Rewards to take surveys sent by SurveyMonkey on behalf of Creators, or an individual that receives surveys through a third party panel provider. Privacy information specific to panelists can be found in our
Contribute Privacy Notice
,
Rewards Privacy Notice
, and
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
.
Visitor
: you are just visiting one of our websites because you are curious,  have been invited to review a survey as a guest, or you have heard about us from our marketing and sales channels!
2.3 Types of Personal Data We Collect
(a) Contact information.
You might provide us with your contact information (for example: name or email address), whether through use of our services, a form on our website, an interaction with our sales or customer support team, or a response to one of SurveyMonkey’s own surveys or forms.
(b) Cookie information.
We use first party and third party cookies and tracking services that employ cookies and page tags (also known as
web beacons
) to collect data about visitors to our websites. This data includes usage and user statistics. Emails sent by SurveyMonkey or by users through our services also include page tags that allow the sender to collect information about who opened those emails and clicked on links in them. We provide more information on cookies in our
Cookies Notice.
(c) Customer support information.
We collect information submitted through our Customer Support portal, such as name, email, and message text. We also record the content of Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales calls.
(d) Usage information.
We collect usage information about you whenever you interact with our websites and services. This includes which webpages you visit, what you click on, when you perform those actions, what language preference you have, what you buy and so on.
(e) Device and browser data.
We collect information from the device and application you use to access our services. Device data mainly means your IP address, operating system version, device type, device ID/MAC address, system and performance information, browser type, and other device, network and browser signals. If you are on a mobile device we also collect the UUID for that device. We also infer your geographic location based on your IP address.
(f) Event data.
Like most websites today, our web servers keep log files that record data each time a device accesses those servers. The log files contain data about the nature of each access, including originating IP addresses, internet service providers, the files viewed on our site (e.g., HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system versions, device type and timestamps.
(g) Referral information.
If you arrive at a SurveyMonkey website from an external source (such as a link on another website or in an email) or have been invited to review a survey as a guest, we record information about the source that referred you to us.
(h) Integration data.
We collect information from third parties with whom SurveyMonkey enables integrations in order to allow you to use both services.
(i) Account information.
Registration information.
You need a SurveyMonkey account before you can use SurveyMonkey services. When you register for an account, we collect your first and last name, username, password and email address.
Billing information.
If you make a payment to SurveyMonkey, we require you to provide your billing details, a name, address, email address and financial information corresponding to your selected method of payment (e.g., a credit card number and expiration date or a bank account number). If you provide a billing address, we will regard that as the location of the account holder to determine the SurveyMonkey entity with whom you contract and the sales tax, if applicable, to be applied to your purchase.
Account settings.
You can set various preferences and personal details on pages like your
account settings page
(or on your account settings page for our other products as applicable). These may include, for example, your default language, time zone and communication preferences (e.g., opting in or out of receiving marketing communications from SurveyMonkey).
(j) Address book information.
We may allow you to import email addresses and other contact information into an
Address Book
so you can easily invite people to take your surveys or fill in your form via our collectors. We do not use this data for our own purposes or to contact anyone, except at your direction.
(k) Survey/form/application data.
We store your survey/form/application data (questions and responses) for you and provide analysis tools for you to use with respect to this data.
(l) First party profile information.
When you sign up for our services you are asked to provide us with information about yourself and to give us more detailed insights into who you are. If you are in a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account this may include providing your photo so your administrator(s) and colleagues can identify you.
(m) Third party profile information.
We may combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn, ZoomInfo, and other data brokers) with information we hold about you to create a user profile.
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
3.1 Creator
We process Personal Data about you as a Creator where:
You have consented;
We need to
f
ulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interes
t; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.1.1
Consent
We rely on your consent to process the following data elements:
(a)
Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with collect data from and advertising cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses. We use this data to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices. We may do so, for instance, to tailor ads, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. You can withdraw your consent at any time.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
To learn more about interest-based advertising and how to opt-out of it, please see our
Cookies Notice
in Section 6. By clearing your cookies in your browser settings, you will no longer see personalized messages in this way but you continue to see ads over the internet that are not based on the information you provided to SurveyMonkey. Depending on your geographic location you can also withdraw your consent using our in-product cookie management tools.
(b) Contact information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries, send you information as part of the services, and send you marketing information. In jurisdictions where opt-in is required, we will only send you marketing materials based on your consent.
3.1.2
Contract
We collect and use the following data elements on the basis that we have to use this information in order to fulfill our contract with you:
(a) Account information.
We need to use your account information to run your account, provide you with services, bill you for our services, resolve disputes such as chargebacks and refund requests, provide you with customer support, and contact you or your organization about your service or account. These communications are of a transactional nature (e.g., service-related announcements, billing-related matters, changes to our services or policies, a welcome email when you first register). You cannot opt out of these communications since they are required to provide our services to you.
We may also use billing information in aggregate to adjust or manage pricing at the individual level or across all service users.
(b) Customer support information.
We will use information submitted through our Customer Support emails, chats, or phone calls, such as name, email, and message content, in order to provide you with customer support.
(c) Usage information.
We use data about how you use our services and how our services are performing to ensure that we’re meeting our service-level agreements (SLAs) or other contractual obligations to you.
(d) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it. We will also use this data to facilitate account verification and sign in and to enforce our password sharing and security policies. We collect this to help us improve your service experience through a specific device/browser by optimizing how the website looks in a particular browser, how your screen brightness affects your experience and to ensure the service operates optimally and as it should on different devices and browsers.
(e) Integration data.
We collect and use information from third parties and integration partners, where applicable to one of our services, to:
Ensure you can sign-up to our service from a third party integration like Facebook/LinkedIn/Microsoft/Google/SSO;
Ensure you can use our service in conjunction with other services.
See further information
here
on our API partners – for other SurveyMonkey services see below or on the website for that service.
(f) Survey questions and survey responses.
We use machine learning techniques on survey data in order to provide users with useful statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. For example, if you have used open text questions in a survey, our machine learning may provide you with useful insights into sentiment and/or the trends in responses to that question in our Analyze survey tool. You have a choice as regards whether or not to use some of these features. For further information see our Respondent Section.
(g) Aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses.
We use aggregated or de-identified information to provide users with useful benchmarking statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services.
We also use this data to enforce our agreements, where applicable.
3.1.3
Legitimate interests
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Contact information.
Where consent is not required, we use contact information to send you marketing information based on our legitimate interests for as long as you do not opt out. You can opt out of marketing communications at any time by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in emails or changing the relevant setting on your
My Account
page.
(b) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for you. This data is de-identified where possible.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our other services.
For example: We collect information about the types of surveys/forms/applications you create (e.g., HR surveys), the types of plans you purchase and your account transactional behavior to build a profile about you so as to help direct you and your organization to other relevant features and services we offer and to optimize user experience, for example by making recommendations to you or your organization.
We may also use usage information such as levels and nature of activity in your account and number of responses you are receiving to personalize the features and services we highlight for you and your organization in our Sites, improve user experience and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our services through our sales and marketing efforts.
(d) Event data.
We use events contained in log data for many different business purposes to include:
To create new services, features, content or make recommendations.
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services.
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
To investigate security issues.
For example: Your IP address is used to determine where an unknown/unauthorized access may have occurred in your account (abuse monitoring).
(e) First party information.
We process other aspects of your account information (like the personal information you provide about your job, your job title, and your marketing preferences) as well as information obtained from public sources, to provide you with a personalized experience and relevant and useful marketing information as well as to make other product, feature and service recommendations to you and your organization to optimize the use of the services we offer (where permitted by law).
You can object to us using your information as described above but in some cases, our ability to fully and properly provide our services to you may be impacted if you do not want us to collect or use the above data. Furthermore, if you are a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holder, your organization controls some of the data which you include in your profile and they can also edit or remove that information through the primary administrator(s) of that account.
(f) Third party information.
We combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn and ZoomInfo) with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve your service experience.
(g) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes.
(h) End page data.
If you use our survey tool, depending on the package you are on and the settings you have selected, your Respondents may reach the standard
survey end page
on completion of a survey. The end page is part of the SurveyMonkey website. We may include our own
research surveys
and polling on this end page. These surveys are optional for any Respondent to take or skip.
(i) De-identified Device Data.
We use aggregated or de-identified Device Data to extract usage patterns and to improve our services.
(j) De-identified Survey Data.
We use machine learning techniques on aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses to understand usage and improve our services.
3.1.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to use and disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or (where possible) de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.2 Respondent
We process Personal Data about you as a Respondent where:
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility to deliver the services to the Creator of the survey;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.2.1
Contract
(a) Contact information.
We only use contact information to respond to an inquiry on behalf of a Customer if you, as a Respondent, contact us.
(b) Cookies.
We use required cookies to ensure the operation of a Creator’s survey, form, application, or other SurveyMonkey product. These cookies are used to ensure that all aspects of the survey operate appropriately and optimally. For more information please read our
Cookies section below
and our
Respondent Cookies Notice
.
Examples: We use page tags to allow the email sender (for a survey or form for example) to measure the performance of email messaging and to learn how to improve email deliverability and open rates. We also use cookies to ensure a respondent can only take a survey once (where the Creator has set this function) and to track completion rates of surveys.
After completion of a survey, in most cases, you will be redirected to our website and treated as a website visitor where other cookies may be used so you should read our Website Visitor section if this is of interest to you.
(c) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
We use your device and browser data to provide our services to the Creator. For example: your IP address is used to ensure that you do not complete the same survey, form, application or questionnaire twice if the creator has included settings to avoid this (ballot stuffing).
(d) Inferred geographic location.
We also may infer your geographic location based on your IP address. This allows Creators to filter responses by inferred geographic location. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(e) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To create and improve services, features, content or make recommendations;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(f) Third parties and integration data.
We will collect and use information from third parties and integration partners to facilitate Creators in sending surveys/forms/applications/questionnaires to you.
(g) Survey response data.
SurveyMonkey may use first party machine learning or third party artificial intelligence tools on data around the type of survey the Creator has sent you, the question type, survey responses (at an aggregated and de-identified/pseudonymized level only), and device and event data associated with responses to  fulfill our contract with Creators and provide Creators with useful and relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. Specifically, we use machine learning on survey data to help Creators by:
identifying trends in their responses;
ongoing training of models to optimize responses;
making product recommendations and providing guidance on which products and services work best in different scenarios (For an example of this check out how SurveyMonkey Genius works here);
Extracting and analyzing usage patterns, for example, we might identify when respondents prefer multiple choice versus open text questions and make predictive response suggestions when certain question types are selected. We might also use this data to help improve analysis of responses;
undertaking personalization for survey Creators;
improving user experience (for example, by collecting and using device and browser information from Respondents to improve how our survey service operates on those devices and in those browsers or by altering questions to match the responses being provided by a Respondent); and
identify insightful data trends (which do not disclose Personal Data) and make recommendations to Creators based on those trends.
A Creator has some controls over how we use responses and may have opted-out of applying machine learning to responses where it is
linked to a specific product feature
in some cases.
3.2.2
Legitimate Interest
s
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to our customers about usage of our services.
For example: We collect information about the types of questions you answer. This data will be aggregated and/or de-identified where possible, so we can examine patterns in terms of respondent preferences when submitting responses. We collect and use all this data to help us improve our product so that questions are easier to answer and to help improve the completion rates on surveys/forms.
We will also use information such as the type of survey, form, questionnaire or application that you answered to personalize products we show you on completion of a survey and to understand trends in our service adoption. See more about
Customizing Survey End Page here
).
(b) Responses (in aggregated and/or de-identified form).
To build new product features.
(c) Inferred geographic location.
We may infer your geographic location based on your IP address to produce aggregated data around Respondent location trends. We will use this information to compare and look at trends on how our service operates and how you interact with surveys, on different browsers and devices. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(d) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present personalized advertisements such as display, videos, and content on the web or connected devices. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(e) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for our Customer. This data is de-identified where possible.
3.2.3
Legal obligation
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity . For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.3 Visitor
We process Personal Data about you as a Visitor where:
You have consented;
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
In some cases, as a former website visitor, we may not have any personal information about you (for example if you have not interacted with our site or have cleared your cookies).
3.3.1
Consent
When you have consented, we collect and use the following information about you:
(a) Contact Information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries or send you information about our services, either where you have agreed to this at the point of providing your information or where you operate in a business which may be interested in our services and for as long as you do not opt-out. opt-out of this marketing at any time.
(b) Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with may use or combine multiple technologies, such as non-required cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices such as tablets, browsers, and mobile phones. We may do so to tailor ads to users, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. We use this data to personalize online marketing campaigns to be relevant to you and your interests in our services. You can withdraw your consent at any time on our Cookie Banner.
If you do not want SurveyMonkey to use this information to serve you targeted ads about our services, you may indicate your preferences at
https://www.aboutads.info
,
https://preferences-mgr.truste.com/
or, if you are located in the European Union, at
https://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You may continue to receive ads over the internet that are not based on information you provided to SurveyMonkey.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
3.3.2
Contract
(a) Device and event data.
We use device data to fix bugs and troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
(b) Comments/Content.
Any comments or content linked to you which you share if you are a guest invited to collaborate on a survey.
3.3.3
Legitimate Interest
s
We also carry out the following processing for legitimate business interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Third party profile information.
Where permitted by law, we combine information about you from third party sources with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve our marketing/sales campaigns and website experience
(b) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you have interacted with our websites to improve our website services for you and all users. Some examples relevant to you:
Examples: We collect information about the webpages you have visited and your activity on our sites at an aggregate level. We collect this information so that we can track the most visited and most useful parts of our website to identify what are our most popular services.
(d) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To monitor abuse and troubleshoot;
To track your preferences and create new services, features, content or make recommendations personalized for you;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(e) Customer Support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support. This data is de-identified where possible.
(f) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes. For example, if you clicked on an advertisement for one of our brands, presented by one of our partners on the web, which brought you to one of our websites, we will record this information to help us track the success of advertising campaigns.
3.3.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use event data:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To prevent potentially illegal activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
4.1 Information you share
Many of our services let you share information with others. Remember that when you share information publicly, it can be indexable by search engines. Our services provide you with different options on sharing and deleting your content but we cannot delete content from search engines so you need to be careful about information you make public.
4.2 Information we share
We do not share your information or data with third parties outside SurveyMonkey except in the following limited circumstances:
(a)
If you are a Creator that is part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your account information and data will be shared with the primary administrator(s) and your survey data may also be visible to other members in your team with whom you share your surveys or with whom you collaborate. Your administrator(s) will be able to view your account data, change your passwords, suspend, transfer or terminate your account or restrict your settings. Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(b)
If you are the primary administrator of a SurveyMonkey team plan, the team name and the domain of the email address on your account may be shared with an individual who has been invited to preview a survey created by one of the members of your team in order to facilitate their request to join the team. You can learn more about how to adjust Team Discovery settings
here.
(c)
If you are part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your plan’s administrator(s) can transfer your survey questions and responses to, or share them with, other members in your team, including your plan’s administrator(s) themselves.  Your plan’s administrator(s) can also delete your survey questions and responses.  Your plan’s administrator(s) may also have the ability to make changes to any aspects of your survey questions and analysis.  Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(d)
If your organization has purchased a SurveyMonkey Enterprise plan and you are using an email address on a domain owned by your employer or organization linked to your individual account, you may be asked to migrate to the SurveyMonkey Enterprise Account and your email address, name and account data will subsequently be visible to the primary administrator(s) for that account once you have been migrated. You may be notified in advance of this migration and given an opportunity to change the email address linked to your account if you are not using your account for business purposes.
(e)
To help us provide certain aspects of our services we use our affiliates and trusted key partners – in particular, we engage third parties to:
facilitate our collectors for sending surveys by email or text to Respondents. For email delivery, we use
SparkPost
and for text/SMS services we use
Twilio
. We share the relevant contact information for respondents (email address or phone number as applicable) with these third parties.
facilitate Creators in making
payments
.
to facilitate the delivery of certain features, for example if you use the “Create a survey using AI” we will send your survey prompts to our AI vendor. We recommend that you do not include Personal Data in these prompts but if you do they will be shared with the AI vendor.
to detect fraud (to include, for example, performing identify checks or verify malicious IPs).
deliver and help us track our marketing and advertising content.
help us track website conversion success metrics.
manage our sales and customer support services to you, including for resolving any disputes.
We enter into confidentiality and data processing terms with partners to ensure they comply with high levels of confidentiality and best practices in privacy and security standards and we regularly review these standards and practices. You can find more information in our
Subprocessor Statement
.
(f)
On your instructions, we share your information or data if you choose to use an integration in conjunction with SurveyMonkey services, to the extent necessary to facilitate that use. See further information
here
on our API partners.
(g)
We also may have to share information or data for the following purposes:
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request;
To enforce applicable policies, including investigation of potential violations;
To detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues;
To protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of our users, the public or to SurveyMonkey and/or as required or permitted by law; and
To facilitate a sale, merger or change in control of all or any part of our company or business or in preparation for any of these events.
5. Data retention
If you are a Creator, we generally do not delete the data in your account as long as your account is active – you are responsible for and control the time periods for which you retain this data. You can read about this
here
for account use. Here are some exceptions:
If you are a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) user on our platforms and you have not engaged with the service actively for some time, we reserve the right to delete your account and data in accordance with our data retention policy.
If you have exceeded your response limit as a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) account holder, we will delete the overages if you do not upgrade within a fixed timeframe.
We also encourage Creators to actively review their data retention practices in their account and take care to retain data only as long as is strictly necessary.
We also describe the expiry periods for cookies on our websites in our
Cookies Notice
.
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
We and our partners use cookies and similar technologies on our websites. For more information see our
Cookies Notice
. For information about cookies used in our surveys please see
Cookies used on Survey Pages
. If you are a customer of SurveyMonkey and separately use cookies or similar technologies in conjunction with any of our products and services, then you yourself will be responsible for complying with any laws related to the use of those technologies and this Privacy Notice is not applicable to that use by you.
You can also choose to remove or disable cookies via your
browser settings
and, depending on your geographic location you can withdraw consent to non-essential cookies using the in-product cookie preferences tool.
You can opt-out from direct marketing in your account and we provide opt-out options in all direct marketing emails. Finally, if you do not wish to see personalized marketing content on the web related to our service you can clear the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article on how to do this
here
.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
7. Security
We have a security statement related to our self-serve businesses (SurveyMonkey and Wufoo) available to view
here
. For information about security related to our other business lines you can speak to a sales representative by completing the form
here
.
8. Safety of Minors
Our services (including creating and responding to surveys) are not intended for and may not be used by minors. “
Minors
” are individuals under the age of 16 (or under a higher age as provided in certain countries or territories). SurveyMonkey does not knowingly collect Personal Data from Minors or allow them to register. If it comes to our attention that we have collected Personal Data from a Minor, we may delete this information without notice. If you have reason to believe that this has occurred, please contact customer support.
9. Data Transfers
Your information and data may be processed in and transferred or disclosed in the United States and countries in which our affiliates are located and in which our service providers are located or have servers. You can view a list of these locations in our
EU Data Transfer Statement
. You can also read about data that is stored in our other data centers here in our
International Data Center Overview
. We ensure that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of protection, for instance by entering into the appropriate back-to-back agreements with standard contractual clauses or other transfer mechanisms as approved by the European Commission or relevant data protection authority.
We have also provided a
help article
which answers some additional questions about data transfers to the US.
9.1
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles.
SurveyMonkey Inc. has self-certified its compliance under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. is committed to subjecting all personal information received from the European Union (EU) member countries, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland to the Framework’s applicable Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
SurveyMonkey Inc. also complies with the onward transfer liability provisions of the DPF.
When SurveyMonkey Inc. receives personal information under the DPF and then transfers it to a third-party service provider acting as agent on SurveyMonkey Inc.'s behalf, SurveyMonkey Inc. has certain liability under the DPF if both (i) the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF and (ii) SurveyMonkey Inc. is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. In certain situations, SurveyMonkey Inc. may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
With respect to Personal Data received or transferred pursuant to the DPF, SurveyMonkey Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.  Please contact SurveyMonkey Inc. as described in Section 11 below if you have any concerns or complaints of any nature. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider, (free of charge) at
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the DPF website
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/How-to-Submit-a-Complaint-Relating-to-a-Participating-Organization-s-Compliance-with-the-DPF-Principles-dpf
, you may invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
10. Who is my data controller?
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback to a Creator using SurveyMonkey services, that Creator is the controller of your data, and SurveyMonkey is the processor of that data.
For SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holders, your organization’s primary administrator controls some basic account level information which you input when setting up your account like name, email address, and profile photo.
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback directly to SurveyMonkey, then SurveyMonkey is the controller and our use of that data is described by this Notice and in our
SurveyMonkey Research Privacy Notice
.
If you are a Creator and have received more responses than your plan allows (“overage data”), SurveyMonkey is the controller over the overage data until you change your plan type, or the overage data is deleted in accordance with section 12.4 of our
Terms of Use
or per the terms of your negotiated contract.
SurveyMonkey is a controller for the account-level data provided by its Creators and panelists from Contribute and Rewards. More information can be found in section 13.6 of this Privacy Notice.
11. Your rights
You may wish to exercise a right to obtain information about yourself or to correct, update or delete that information. For more information about these rights you can read about it
here
. Some of these rights may be subject to some exceptions or limitations in local law. Please note your rights and choices vary depending upon your location. We will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and we will respond to your request to exercise these rights within a reasonable time (and in all cases within 30 days of receiving a request) subject to the below for specific categories of person.
11.1
Apply Applicants
For SurveyMonkey Apply users please see
information on how to exercise your rights here
.
11. 2 Creator
Where you hold an account with any SurveyMonkey service, you are entitled to a copy of all Personal Data which we hold in relation to you. You also may be entitled to request that we restrict how we use your data or object to some aspect of our treatment of your data. You can access a lot of your data in your own account when you log in. If you want to exercise your rights, please contact us
here
.
Depending on your plan type, SurveyMonkey also enables you to export your own response data from our system in a variety of formats so that you can back it up or use it with other applications. Alternatively, for assistance in exporting or deleting responses, you can contact us.
11.3 Respondent
Where you have responded to a survey, form, questionnaire or application sent to you by a Creator using a SurveyMonkey service, you will need to reach out directly to that individual or organization to discuss managing, deleting, accessing, restricting access to or otherwise withdrawing consent for use of the information which you provided to them in your responses. SurveyMonkey does not control your response data and, accordingly, is not in a position to directly handle these requests in relation to that data. If you are having difficulties finding this Creator or if you have any other questions after reading this Privacy Notice, you can
contact us
through
our support team
and we will try our best to help you.
11.4 Panelist
If you have created a Rewards or Contribute account with us, you can request a copy of your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, or correct it.
11.5 Visitor
Where you have visited our website and you want to exercise any of the above rights please contact our support team
here
. Alternatively, if your request is for the right to be forgotten as it relates only to our use of cookies you can achieve this by clearing the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article describing how to do this
here
.
11.6 Authorized Agent
If you are a third party organization acting on behalf of a data subject (or class of data subjects) to exercise data subject rights, we do work with you. In this case:
We ask you to follow our process outlined in this Privacy Notice for security reasons so that we can independently verify the Creator (if it is a Creator) making any requests to exercise their rights.
Where applicable, we directly interact with a Creator’s registered email address, because we authenticate users with username and unique password and not with other identifying information (e.g., photo ID or similar).
Please do not share other forms of personal identification for data subjects with us when submitting requests.
11.7
Other rights and choices
For rights and choices specific to US consumers, please refer to our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
. Please note we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and the authenticity of your request as described in that Notice.
11.8
Contact
Except as explicitly provided herein, please use the following contact information for privacy inquiries
SurveyMonkey Inc.
910 Park Pl, Suite 300
San Mateo, California 94403
United States
Or contact us
here
.
SurveyMonkey Europe UC
Ella House, Suite 40.4
40 Merrion Square East
Dublin 2
D02 NP96
Ireland
Or contact us
here
.
Data Protection Officer
: SurveyMonkey's Data Protection Officer is registered with the Irish Data Protection Commission.  Contact our DPO at
dpo@surveymonkey.com
.
Note that our contact form is the
best
way to make a rights request with us.
11.9
Complaints
If you are a resident in the European Union and you are dissatisfied with how we have managed a complaint you have submitted to us, you are entitled to contact your local data protection supervisory authority. As SurveyMonkey Europe UC operates its business in Ireland, it operates under the remit of the Irish Office of the Data Protection Commissioner (see:
IDPC Website
).
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
We can make changes to the
Privacy Basics
and this Privacy Notice from time to time. We will identify the changes we have made on
this page
. In circumstances where a change will materially change the way in which we collect or use your personal information or data, we will send a notice of this change to all of our account holders.
13. Privacy information specific to other services
Although this Privacy Notice applies to all our Services, some information may be specific to individual Services. Please see below for more information
13.1
TechValidate
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our TechValidate users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.1.1
TechFacts
TechFacts are published on an anonymous basis – that is, no Respondent Personal Information is displayed in a TechFact unless your Respondents authorize the use of their name and company affiliation. You are able to see the individual respondent’s identity in your account and, if you give a SurveyMonkey employee permission to view that response, then SurveyMonkey will also see this. However, we never publish or disseminate this information (unless you explicitly ask us to do so).
We assign a unique identification number to each TechFact. The ID will appear on each copy of the TechFact. Our site is designed so that visitors may look up and view TechFacts without the collection of any personal information (except for such visitor's internet protocol (IP) address).
13.2
SurveyMonkey Apply
SurveyMonkey Apply is an online application system that helps organizations collect applications, manage subscriptions and facilitate reviews. Our main Privacy Notice applies to
apply.surveymonkey.com
(“SurveyMonkey Apply”) except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is applicable only to our survey tool. Responses and Respondents in this section are intended as reference to applicants and their applications for the purposes of use of SurveyMonkey Apply.
When an applicant submits an application through SurveyMonkey Apply, their login information can be used for multiple applications across the SurveyMonkey Apply site.
If you have any questions about your personal information in the context of our SurveyMonkey Apply service, you can contact us
here
.
13.3
Wufoo
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our Wufoo users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.3.1
Your control over your form data
We store your form data (form content and responses) for you. You have the following controls over your form data:
Download/backup your form data. We provide you with the ability to export, share and publish your form data in a variety of formats. This allows you to create your own backups or work with your data offline. See
here
for data exporting instructions.
Delete your form data. You can delete your form data (including parts of forms, entire forms, and responses to forms) through your account's user interface. See
here
for how to delete form entries.
Cancel your Wufoo account. You can cancel your Wufoo account at any time through your account management page. Any cancellation of your Wufoo account will result in the deletion of your account and all form data stored in it. This data cannot be recovered once your account is cancelled. Please be aware that we may for a time retain residual information in our backup and/or archival copies of our database for up to 90 days.
We would like to emphasize that we will not use your form data to compete with you, market to your clients, or contact them for any other means of profit. We will also not sell your form data to anyone.
13.4
GetFeedback Digital (formerly Usabilla)
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Digital users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Digital’s service, in which case this Section takes precedence.
Information about GetFeedback Digital APIs is provided
here
.
Information about GetFeedback Digital partners is provided
here
.
We do not delete customer data unless the customer has instructed us to do so. You can delete your data at any time. You can also set a data retention period between 1-36 months after which data is automatically deleted.
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
To adjust your preferences and settings around data and information you must be logged into your account and/or can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com for assistance or you can read about this more
here
.
To exercise your data rights (as described in our main Privacy NoticeSection 14 above) you can use our
contact form
(please specify that this is a GetFeedback Digital request) or you can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com.
13.5
GetFeedback Direct
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Direct users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Direct's service, in which case this section takes precedence. If you are part of any of our early adopter programs our main Privacy Notice will apply to you.
13.5.1
Sentiment Analysis
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
13.5.2
Salesforce
GetFeedback Direct is a Salesforce ISVforce partner. If you have created a GetFeedback Direct account, the registration information you provide will be disclosed to Salesforce.com, Inc. and will be used by Salesforce.com, Inc. pursuant to its privacy policy (see
Salesforce Privacy Policy
). More information about how to automate emails in GetFeedback Direct using Salesforce is available
here
. Information about displaying a Post Chat Survey in Salesforce Chat can be found
here
.
13.5.3
Suppression Lists
You can manage your suppression lists and map these to Salesforce so as to ensure you comply with unsubscribe requests from your Respondents by following the steps outlined
here
. For clarity, we are not responsible for how you manage your suppression lists.
13.5.4
Contact Us
To exercise your rights (as described in Section 11 of the Privacy Notice), please contact the GetFeedback Direct support team at
help@getfeedback.com
.
13.6
Audience
If you are a panelist using our Rewards or Contribute apps, please read the following notices as they apply to your use of those Services:
SurveyMonkey Contribute Privacy Notice
SurveyMonkey Rewards Privacy Notice
If you are a panelist responding to a SurveyMonkey survey through a third party, please read the following notice as it applies to your use of those Services:
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/privacy-basics/:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
Privacy Basics
This is a snapshot of how SurveyMonkey treats personal information and data. FOR FULL DETAILS READ OUR
PRIVACY NOTICE
. We have also linked to the corresponding sections of the Privacy Notice in this Privacy Basics page.
For details of our Data Processing Agreement with standard contractual clauses ("SCCs") for data transfers see
here
.  For our EU Data Transfer Statement see
here
.
1. Definitions
Creators:
You hold an account within a SurveyMonkey service, or are invited to collaborate on a survey, form, application, or questionnaire.
Respondents:
You have received a survey, form, application, or questionnaire powered by a SurveyMonkey service.
Panelists:
You have signed up and agreed to take surveys sent to you by SurveyMonkey on behalf of Creators.
Visitors:
You are just visiting one of our websites because you are curious, you are a guest collaborating on a survey with a Creator, or you have heard about us from our marketing or sales channels.
We have tried to summarize what personal information we collect about you and how we manage it in plain English (as best we can, given we are a technology business). If we haven't defined a term here, please see our main
Privacy Notice
. We aim to be transparent with you.
We are always looking for ways to improve and welcome feedback on this information through our privacy support team at
privacy@surveymonkey.com
.
2. How we use your personal information
See
Section 3 in our Privacy Notice
for more information.
What we collect from you and how we use it
Contact Information (for example, name or email address).
Account and Usage information (how you use the services, what pages you click on, etc.)
Device and browser data (for example, IP address, device type, MAC ID, browser type)
Cookies (data we get from first and third party cookies, page tags, pixels and similar technology placed on your device)
Event data or log files that record data each time a device accesses a server.
This contains data about the nature of access, for example, originating IP addresses, Internet service providers, the files viewed on our site (like HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system versions, device type, and timestamps.
Referral information.
This is information about the place where you were before you came to a SurveyMonkey site – for example, if you were on social media before clicking on a link to a SurveyMonkey website, we record information about the source that referred you to us.
Information from third parties and integration partners.
This includes your name and email address or IP address where you have given permission to those third parties to share that information with us or where that information is publicly available either online or through your device/browser data.
Profile information.
This includes your title, name, and photo (if you provide it). If you are a Panelist, it also includes things like age range, gender, salary range and other criteria you have shared with us.
All of the above categories of information.
Other things Creators care about
Account Information and Settings
We use this information to run your account and honor your service preferences. If you are an Enterprise user, we manage this information in conjunction with your organization.
Registration information
We use this information to send you transactional emails and updates about usage and billing.
Billing information
We use this information to bill you, to properly manage your payments, and for our own internal financial audit and reconciliation purposes.
Address book information (emails and phone numbers)
We use this information only to deliver your surveys to your recipients.
Survey/form/application/questionnaire data
We use this information only to deliver the services to you, return analyzed response data to you, and improve the services.
End Page
If you use our survey tool, your Respondents may reach the standard
survey end page
on completion of a survey. The end page is part of the SurveyMonkey website. We may include our own
research surveys
on this end page. These surveys are optional for any Respondent to take or skip.
Other things Respondents care about
We host surveys, forms, applications, and questionnaires on our websites and collect your responses. If you have any questions about a survey you took or a form, application, or questionnaire you completed,
please contact the Creator directly
. SurveyMonkey is not responsible for that content. The Creator is usually the same person who invited you to take the survey or questionnaire or complete the form or application and they should have their own Privacy Notice.
We do use and analyze de-identified response data and usage information (for example, looking at page view data, response rates, response types and survey type) for service delivery to include:
• To continually improve the service;
• To make our recommendations around surveys or services included on our website at the end of a survey taking experience more relevant;
• To improve the user interface;
• To maintain a consistent and reliable user experience; and
• To improve services by looking at what questions Creators are asking and the quality of their responses and response rates so that we can enhance our existing features and build new ones to optimize question/answer rates for Creators.
For more information, see Sections 3 and 4 of our
Privacy Notice.
Whether or not your responses are anonymous depends on how the Creator of the survey/form/application or questionnaire you receive has configured it. Contact them to find out, or click
here
to read more about respondent anonymity.
Other things Panelists care about
If you are a Panelist - you have signed up to take surveys relevant to you, as sent to you by SurveyMonkey or a SurveyMonkey Customer. SurveyMonkey encourages only residents of the United States to sign up to its Contribute or Rewards panel. For other panels that are not internally sourced by us, we partner with various panel providers. We therefore have a separate Privacy Notice for panelists who took a survey originating from our service but who are not Contribute or Rewards panelists. If you are one of these panelists, you can click
here
to read our Third Party Panelist Privacy Notice. If you are a Contribute or Rewards panelist – read on!
We do not sell your profile to marketing firms! While we do provide some of your profile to our customers who wish to deploy surveys (see our
Contribute Privacy Statement
), we do not sell it to marketing companies – we allow our customers to send you surveys solely based on your profile suitability.
3. Important Notices
A Special Cookies Statement
: We use cookies, pixels and similar technology as we have said above. This technology can help us make sure that you are seeing only advertising relevant to you. However, there is a lot about the world of cookies online that needs to improve. We encourage you to inform yourself about your rights in this area and to actively engage with cookie tools on websites to ensure you are expressing your preferences. We have worked hard to improve our preference management of cookies on our sites but it is important you manage these preferences all across the Internet too. Depending on your geographic location you can withdraw your consent to our use of non-essential cookies by interacting with our in-product cookie preferences tool.
See
Section 6 in our Privacy Notice
for more information on Cookies.
Our Privacy Commitment:
Your surveys, forms, applications, and questionnaires and any responses you collect through them are private (
except if you have made them available via a public link in which case they would be searchable on the internet
). We don’t sell those individual responses to anyone and we use them only for purposes related to providing or improving our services for you, and as outlined in the
Privacy Notice
. For example, we do make use of respondent related data in our survey tool to aggregate usage trends (mainly metadata) around Respondents (for example, questions answered and success of specific survey and question types over time) so that we can make more accurate recommendations to you around use of our services.
We respect respondent contact information. To make it easier for you to invite people to take surveys and questionnaires or fill out forms and applications via email, you may upload lists of email addresses or phone numbers, in which case SurveyMonkey acts as a mere custodian of that data. We don’t sell these email addresses or phone numbers and we use them only as directed by you and in accordance with our
Privacy Notice
. The same goes for any Respondent email addresses or phone numbers collected in your account.
If you are a US consumer, please visit our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
for more information about our use of your personal information.
4. Who we work with
See
Section 4 in our Privacy Notice
for more information.
To help us provide certain aspects of our services, we work with affiliates and trusted partners – in particular, we engage third parties:
To facilitate our email collectors for sending surveys by email or text to Respondents. For email delivery, we use SparkPost and for text/SMS services we use Twilio. We share the relevant contact information for respondents (email address or phone number as applicable) with these third parties;
To facilitate customers in making payments and to detect fraudulent payment attempts;
To deliver and help us track our marketing and advertising content;
To help us track website conversion success metrics;
To manage our sales and customer support services to you (including resolving disputes); and
To deliver certain AI driven product features which you choose to use.
Where we use any third parties to help us deliver services to you (the Creator), and they process your response data as part of those services, we maintain a list of these third parties
here
. Keep in mind this list covers all of our different services, so not all of these third parties will be applicable to the service you are using.
5. How long do we keep your data?
See
Section 5 in our Privacy Notice
for more information.
If you are a Creator, we generally do not delete the data in your account as long as your account is active – you are responsible for and control the time periods for which you retain this data. You can read about this
here
for our surveys tool and
here
for our GetFeedback Digital service. Here are some exceptions:
• If you are a free user on our platforms and you have not engaged with the service actively for some time, we reserve the right to delete your account and data in accordance with our data retention policy.
• If you have exceeded your response limit in a Basic (free) account, we will delete the overages if you do not upgrade within a fixed timeframe.
We also encourage Creators to actively review their data retention practices in their account and take care to retain data only as long as is strictly necessary.
6. Your data rights
See
Section 11 in our Privacy Notice
for more information. If you want to exercise your rights, please contact us
here
.
Data Protection Officer
: SurveyMonkey's Data Protection Officer is registered with the Irish Data Protection Commission.  Contact our DPO at
dpo@surveymonkey.com
7. Other
We may occasionally include optional additional surveys (accessible from the standard survey end page) on completion of our customer surveys. Participating in these research surveys is entirely voluntary. If you have taken a survey or submitted a form which we created as part of our own research projects, you can read our
SurveyMonkey Research Privacy Notice
here for more information.
ALTHOUGH PRIVACY BASICS APPLIES TO ALL OUR SERVICES, IF YOU ARE USING THE BELOW SERVICES PLEASE CLICK ON
THIS LINK
TO BRING YOU DIRECTLY TO SERVICE SPECIFIC INFORMATION:
TECHVALIDATE
SURVEYMONKEY APPLY
WUFOO
GETFEEDBACK DIGITAL
GETFEEDBACK DIRECT (or any Early Adoption New Services)
SURVEYMONKEY CONTRIBUTE/REWARDS (IN-HOUSE PANEL)
Sub-policy 1
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/region-specific-privacy-statement/?ut_source=legal&ut_source2=privacy&ut_source3=inline:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
Region Specific Privacy Notice
LAST UPDATED: August 1, 2023
August 1, 2023 (current)
June 15, 2023
July 1, 2021
November 2, 2020
July 7, 2020
January 1, 2020
This region specific privacy notice ("Notice") applies to all the products, services, websites and apps offered by SurveyMonkey Inc., SurveyMonkey Europe UC, SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Eireli, and their affiliates (collectively “SurveyMonkey”), except where otherwise noted. SurveyMonkey refers to these products, services, websites, and apps collectively as the “services” in this policy. Unless otherwise noted, our services are provided by SurveyMonkey Inc. inside of the United States, by SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Eireli inside of Brazil, and by SurveyMonkey Europe UC everywhere else. This Notice is an extension to and forms part of the main
SurveyMonkey Privacy Notice
.
This Notice describes the rights of individuals who are California residents under the
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018
("CCPA"), and residents of other states or regions in the United States of America with similar applicable privacy laws who interact with SurveyMonkey as a Service Provider. While we have set out the categories below as required by the CCPA and similar privacy laws, you can review our
Privacy Notice
for examples and other information that describes our data collection and use, as previously disclosed to you which have not changed under this Notice.
This Notice does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees or job applicants in their capacity as employees or job applicants. Employees and job applicants should refer to our Employee Privacy Notice or Candidate Privacy Notice, respectively.
Except for residents of California, it also does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees, owners, directors, officers, or contractors of businesses in the course of our provision or receipt of business-related services.
This Notice consists of the following sections:
Your Privacy Rights
Categories of Personal Information We Collect and Sources
Categories of Unaffiliated Parties with Whom We Disclose Personal Information
Purposes of Collection, Use, and Disclosure
Data Retention
Your Choices for Advertising Cookies
Contact Us
1.  Your Privacy Rights
Subject to certain restrictions, if you are a resident of California and states with similar privacy laws, you may have the right to request that we:
confirm that we are processing your personal information or disclose what personal information we collect about you;
delete any personal information that we collected from or maintain about you;
correct inaccurate personal information we maintain about you;
opt you out of any "sale" or "sharing" of personal information about you;
opt you out of the processing of personal information for purposes of targeted advertising or profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning you;
limit the use or disclosure of sensitive personal information if used or disclosed for reasons other than those permitted by the CCPA; and
not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights.
Applicable laws may also give you the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests, including our means of verifying your identity. If you would like further information regarding your legal rights under applicable law or would like to exercise any of them, please contact us
here
. While our contact form is the best way to reach us, you may also email us at
privacy@surveymonkey.com
.
Right to request access to your personal information
You have the right to
request a copy of your personal information
. Under the CCPA and similar privacy laws, you can also request that we disclose: the categories of personal information that we have collected about you; the categories of sources from which the personal information was collected; the business or commercial purpose(s) for which personal information was collected or “sold”; the categories of third parties with whom we share personal information; the categories of personal information that may have been “sold”, and the categories of third parties to whom the personal information was “sold” (if applicable); and the categories of personal information that we disclose for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties to whom the personal information was disclosed (if applicable).
However, as permitted under the CCPA, we may withhold some information where the risk to you or your personal information is too great to disclose the information, such as financial information or account passwords.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
Subject to certain exceptions under applicable law, you have the right to
request that we delete personal information
that we have collected from or about you. However, we may retain personal information as authorized under applicable law, such as personal information required or necessary to provide our services, to protect against fraudulent activity, to identify and fix bugs, to exercise our or another person’s free speech or other rights, to comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, for scientific or historical research, for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. We need certain types of information so that we can provide our services. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our services.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
Subject to certain exceptions under applicable law, you have the right to request that we correct inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you.
How to exercise your rights
You may exercise your access and deletion rights by submitting your request
here
. While our
contact form
is the best way to reach us, you may also email us at
privacy@surveymonkey.com
. For security purposes, we may request additional information from you to verify your identity when you request to exercise your rights related to your personal information.
If you have an online account with us, logging into your account will serve to verify your identity and request. If we have reason to suspect that the security of your account is compromised, we will request additional information from you to match with our existing records to verify your identity, depending on the nature of the request and the sensitivity of the information sought.
Once you submit a request (1) to access the categories of personal information we have about you or (2) to obtain a copy of specific pieces of personal information we have about you, we will ask that you verify your identity by logging into your account using your username and password. There, we will provide you with your information in a password-protected format.
To request that we delete personal information we have collected from you, you will need to authenticate with us by first logging into your account using your username and password on file with us and deleting your account. Once you let us know you have taken this action, we will initiate the deletion process.
Most personal information can be corrected within your account. If you need instructions on how to do so, please contact us
here
.
If you wish to exercise any of these rights and do not have an account with us (for example if you are an authorized agent submitting a request on behalf of another individual), please contact us
here
and we will request additional information to verify your identity where possible.
If we deny your request in whole or in part, you may have the right to appeal the decision. In such circumstances, we will provide you with information regarding the appeals process.
Right to non-discrimination for exercising your rights
The CCPA and similar privacy laws may prohibit us from discriminating against you for exercising the rights described in this section. Such discrimination may include charging different prices for our services, providing or suggesting that you will receive a different level or quality of services, or refusing to provide services to you if you exercise your rights. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights.
2.  Categories of Personal Information We Collect and the Sources
We collect the following categories of personal information:
Identifiers (such as name, postal address, email address, phone number, or IP address)
Legally protected classifications (such as gender and marital status)
Commercial information (such as transaction data)
Financial data (such as billing information)
Internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or app usage)
Location information (e.g. inferred from your IP address)
Audio recordings (such as phone calls recorded for Customer Support or Sales purposes)
Professional or employment-related data (such as the name of your employer)
Education level (where you voluntarily provide us with such information in our Contribute or Rewards products)
Inferences drawn from other information we collect
Other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with you
Some of the personal information we collect may also be treated as “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. We collect the following categories of “sensitive personal information”:
Your account log in details (username and password)
The contents of a consumer’s email where SurveyMonkey provides email services
Information that reveals health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or affiliations, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or information related to one's sexual orientation (where you voluntarily provide us with such information in our Contribute or Rewards products)
All of the categories of personal information we collect about you come from the following categories of sources:
You, including through your use of our services
Automatically collected from you
Our affiliate companies
Other parties, including when you give permission to social networks to disclose your information with us or where you have made your personal information publicly available online
If you interact with our site as a Respondent, all of your response data is controlled by the person or business who sent you the survey/form/application/questionnaire (the “Creator”) and we recommend you contact them about their practices under the CCPA and similar privacy laws, as SurveyMonkey processes this response data on the Creator’s behalf and the Creator – not SurveyMonkey – is responsible for responding to your request.
3. Categories of Third Parties with Whom We Share Personal Information
We disclose all of the categories of personal information we collect about you (as detailed above) with the following categories of third parties:
Our affiliate companies
Aggregators (such as analytics services)
Third parties (such as vendors that provide services to us and our integration partners)
Your organization, through its purchase of an Enterprise account with us, in the case of identifiers (such as name, postal address, email address, phone number, or IP address)
Others with your consent
4. Purposes of Collection, Use, and Disclosure
We collect, use, and disclose all of the categories of personal information and sensitive personal information (as detailed above) for the following commercial or business purposes:
Providing our services (for example, account servicing and maintenance, customer service, advertising and marketing, analytics, and communication about our services)
For our operational purposes, and the operational purposes of our vendors and integration partners
Improving our existing services and developing new services (for example, by conducting research to develop new products or features)
Helping to ensure security and integrity to the extent the use of the consumer's personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate for these purposes
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with this specification and other standards
Short-term, transient use, such as customizing content that we or our vendors display on the services
Other uses that advance our commercial or economic interests, such as third party advertising and communicating with you about relevant offers from third party partners
Other uses that we notify you about
We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than for those purposes for which you cannot opt out under the CCPA.
5. Data Retention
We retain your personal information for the periods described in our
Help Center
.
6. Your Choices for Advertising Cookies
The CCPA requires businesses that “sell” or "share" personal information, as the terms “sell” and "share" are defined under the CCPA, to provide California residents the right to opt-out from such sales or sharing. Sale and/or sharing are in such a way that may include allowing advertising vendors to receive certain information (such as cookie identifiers, IP addresses, and/or browsing behavior) to add to a profile (about your device, browser, or you). Such profiles may enable delivery of interest-based advertising by such advertising vendors within their platform or on other sites. When you visit our website, we may share the following categories of information for such interest-based advertising, which may be considered a “sale” or "sharing" as defined by the CCPA: (1) device information and identifiers, such as IP address and unique advertising identifiers and cookies; and (2) connection and usage information, such as browsing history or app usage. We engage in such practices to provide you with more tailored marketing content (about our services or other services), and to evaluate whether this content is useful or effective. You may opt-out of such advertising cookies on a go-forward basis within our cookie banner or by contacting us through our
Help Center
. For more information on clearing previously-placed advertising cookies, please see our Help Center article
here
.
We do not “sell” or “share” sensitive personal information, as those terms are defined by the CCPA.
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt-out preferences you have exercised through this method will only to the specific device/browser on which you made them.
Please note that Do Not Track is a different privacy mechanism than the “Global Privacy Control” browser choice referenced above, which is a browser-based control that indicates whether you would like to opt out of processing of your personal information for online behavioral advertising purposes.
Our services are not directed to consumers under 16 - and such minors are not authorized to use our services - so we do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age.
7. Contact Us
For details on how to contact us, please see our
Privacy Notice
.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/candidate-privacy-notice/:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
SurveyMonkey Global Applicant and Candidate Data Privacy Notice
EFFECTIVE DATE: November 27, 2018
LAST UPDATED: July 15, 2024
This SurveyMonkey Global Applicant and Candidate Data Privacy (“Notice”) is provided to let you know what Personal Data SurveyMonkey
1
(“we, us, our”) may hold in relation to you and how we use that data.
SurveyMonkey respects the fundamental importance of data privacy, security, and protection. As a global business that prioritizes these principles, we are committed to handling your personal information responsibly, transparently, and in accordance with all applicable data protection laws.
Please see below to understand our use of your Personal Data. We may provide you with more information when we collect your personal information when we think this might be relevant and proper to do so.
Scope
This Notice applies to you because you are considering applying, you have applied to work with us, or because our talent team has sourced your data and is interested in reviewing your qualifications. It applies to all Personal Data collected, maintained, transmitted, stored, retained, or otherwise used (i.e., processed) by us.
It also applies to third parties whose information you provide to us (e.g., work references), and you should share this Notice with those people. This Notice does not apply to our handling of data gathered about you in your role as a visitor of our website or user of our services. When you interact with us in that role, the
SurveyMonkey Privacy Notice
applies.
This Notice does not form part of or create any offer or contract of employment and does not create a contractual relationship between us and you.
What is Personal Data?
'Personal Data' is any data relating to a living individual who can be identified directly from that data or indirectly in conjunction with other information. We may hold some or all of the categories of Personal Data set out below, in relation to you. We collect such information either directly from you or (where applicable) from another person or entity, such as an employment agency or consultancy, background check provider, or other referral sources (in accordance with local national laws and regulations).
Personal
- Identifiers such as a name, postal address, online identifier, email address;
Protected classifications – such as  nationality;
Professional or employment related information
– including Curriculum Vitae, cover letter and/or application form, previous employment background, references from previous employers,  selection and verification records, educational details, professional transcripts, professional certifications, special skills, language skills, memberships of committees or other bodies;
Audio recordings
– such as recordings of interview/interview notes
,
;
Premises and IT access
- including information required to access office locations and information about your connection to our networks while on premises;
General correspondence/meetings
- relating to the recruitment process;
Financial
- Payroll and finance, including paying any agreed applicable expenses associated with the recruitment process e.g. travel expenses (if any);
Incapacity
- any accommodations or adjustments required for interview or application purposes in connection with any incapacity
.
;
Other information
that directly or indirectly identifies you – such as visa status, gender, date of birth, and publicly-available information, such as publicly-available information in social media profiles;
Sensitive personal information
- including drivers’ licence information and race (US candidates only).
Purpose and Basis for Processing
We may hold, process, and disclose Personal Data provided by you for the following purposes:
We may hold and process Personal Data from other third-party sources for the following purposes:
Please note that you have a right to object to processing of your Personal Data where that processing is carried on for our legitimate interest. We may aggregate/pseudononymize your Personal Data to analyse and improve our recruitment processes and to ensure we are meeting our diversity and inclusion goals.
Special Categories of Personal Data
Certain categories of your Personal Data are regarded as 'special' or ‘sensitive’ including information relating to:
Physical or mental health data
- such as information about your physical or mental health or condition; for example, we will use information about disability status to consider whether we need to provide for appropriate adjustments during the recruitment process.
Driver’s license number
(for example if required for a background check)
Other special categories of Personal Data
- such as racial or ethnic origin; religious or similar beliefs; membership of a trade union; the commission or alleged commission of any offence; and any proceedings for any offence committed or alleged to have been committed, the disposal of those proceedings, or the sentence of any court in those proceedings.
We only process such data where necessary and to uphold specific rights of SurveyMonkey or of a prospective employee, under employment law or for the assessment of your working capacity. This information may be used to help us monitor compliance with equal opportunity legislation, along with accommodations or adjustments required for interview or application purposes in connection with any incapacity. In most applications, this is probably not going to be the case but if it is necessary, we will treat this data with the utmost sensitivity. SurveyMonkey does not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than purposes for which you cannot opt out under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (‘CCPA’).
We will only process data relating to your criminal convictions or involvement in criminal proceedings when permitted by law, or where provided voluntarily by you.
Consent
In principle, we do not rely on your consent for data use. We may, however, from time to time, ask for your consent to (i) use your Personal Data for a specific purpose (including to consider you for future job opportunities within SurveyMonkey or to attend recruiting events); and/or (ii) process your Personal Data (including ‘special’ or ‘sensitive’ data) to protect your vital interests or the interests of another. If we do so, we will provide you with full details of the data that we would like and the reason we need it, as well as the fact that you can revoke your consent at any time and how you should do that. If you withdraw your consent, we will no longer process your application and, subject to our retention policy, we will dispose of your Personal Data securely.
Where you do not provide us with your Personal Data
If you do not provide us with certain Personal Data, we may not be able to process your job application or assess your suitability for a particular role, comply with our legal obligations, or manage our business.
Security and Storage of Personal Data
We securely store your Personal Data in a centralised database and within certain trusted third-party vendor tools, with controlled access to these locations. Access to Personal Data (including special data) in both electronic and paper form is restricted to members of the HR Department and employees who have a legitimate and justifiable reason to view such data.
Recipients of Your Personal Data
We may disclose your Personal Data to a Group Company
2
including, without limitation, for the following reasons: to run global processes, carry out group wide reporting, or make decisions about hiring or promotion. It may be necessary from time to time for us to disclose Personal Data to third parties or agents, including without limitation to the following:
Vendors to assist in the administration, processing and management of certain activities pertaining to prospective employees;
Individuals or companies employed by SurveyMonkey to carry out specific services, functions, or consultancy work, including external reference agencies and other financial institutions;
Relatives or legal representatives of prospective employees;
Regulatory bodies or others to whom we are legally obliged or required to disclose information, including Workplace Relations Commission, relevant government departments or agencies, Courts and Court-appointed persons;
Legal and medical practitioners;
Other SurveyMonkey personnel (including personnel of affiliates and subsidiaries) involved in the recruiting and hiring process;
Litigation Purposes: to seek legal advice from our external lawyers or in connection with litigation with a third party;
Medical Practitioners at your request, such as relating to any adjustments made in connection with any incapacity; and
Potential or actual purchasers or bidders of SurveyMonkey.
We will inform you in advance, to the extent legally permissible, if we intend to further process or disclose your Personal Data for a purpose or to a party other than those set out above. We take all reasonable steps, as required by law, to ensure the safety, privacy, and integrity of such data and information and, where appropriate, enter into contracts with such third parties to do so.
Transfer of Personal Data outside the EEA
The Personal Data that we collect from you may be transferred and stored, inside or outside the European Economic Area (“
EEA”
), for the purposes described above, including by personnel who work for us or for one of our third-party vendors who act on our behalf. We will provide for suitable safeguards to protect the privacy and integrity of your Personal Data in such circumstances.
Data Retention
Data will be stored for as long as required to satisfy the purpose for which the data was collected and used, unless a longer period is necessary for our legal obligations or in relation to a legal claim(s).
For European candidates, we retain your data for a period of 1 year after the job application process is finalized, unless, you consent to us storing it for longer for consideration for future roles. We will also retain your data longer if we are legally or contractually required to retain it for a longer period (e.g. if you are employed by SurveyMonkey).
For non-European candidates, we retain your data for a period of 5 years after the job application process is finalized, unless you consent to us storing it for longer for consideration for future roles. We will also retain your data longer if we are legally or contractually required to retain it for a longer period (e.g. if you are employed by SurveyMonkey).
Your Data Rights
If these rights are provided to you by local law, you have several rights in relation to your Personal Data. You may have a right to:
access a copy of your Personal Data held by SurveyMonkey;
request rectification of your Personal Data if it is inaccurate or incomplete;
request erasure of your Personal Data in certain circumstances;
restrict our use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances;
move (or port) Personal Data which is automated in certain circumstances;
object to the processing of your Personal Data where our legal basis for processing your data is our legitimate interests;
not to be subject to a decision based on automated processing of your Personal Data, including profiling which has legal or similar significant effects;
withdraw consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing of your Personal Data based on consent before its withdrawal;
Not receive discriminatory treatment for the exercise of these rights; and
lodge a complaint with the Office of the Data Protection Commissioner (or other relevant supervisory authority in your jurisdiction).
However, these rights may not be exercised in certain circumstances (e.g., if needed to comply with a legal obligation or in relation to a legal claim(s)). If you wish to exercise these rights – or would like to designate an authorized agent to do so on your behalf - please contact our
HR Department
. We may request proof of identification to verify your request.
We do not “sell” or “share” your Personal Data, and specifically do not have knowledge that we “sell” or “share” the Personal Data of candidates under 16 years of age, as the terms “sell” and “share” are defined in the CCPA.
Further Information
If you require any further clarification regarding this Notice, please contact
hr-privacy@surveymonkey.com
.
The SurveyMonkey Global Applicant and Candidate Data Privacy Notice may be updated at any time. We may notify you if there are any material changes to how we handle your Personal Data. It is acknowledged that you have received a copy of the SurveyMonkey Global Applicant and Candidate Data Privacy Notice and that you understand and agree to its contents.
1
SurveyMonkey may refer to SurveyMonkey Inc. or any other affiliate/subsidiary SurveyMonkey hiring entity.
2
For the purposes of this Notice, “
Group Company
” means a company which is a Subsidiary or Holding Company of SurveyMonkey or any Subsidiary of such Holding Company from time to time (and for this purpose "Subsidiary" and "Holding Company" have the meanings given to them respectively in sections 7 and 8 of the Companies Act 2014).
Sub-policy 3
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/surveymonkey-contribute-privacy-notice/:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
SurveyMonkey Contribute Privacy Notice
Last Updated: December 5, 2024
Versions:
December 5, 2024 (current)
August 1, 2023
June 15, 2023
December 15, 2022
July 1, 2021
November 2, 2020
July 9, 2020
November 21, 2019
September 26, 2019
May 30, 2019
April 11, 2018
This privacy notice describes privacy practices which are specific to
https://contribute.surveymonkey.com
("
SMC
") and should be read in conjunction with our
main Privacy Notice
and
Region Specific Privacy Notice
(for US residents). Where there is a conflict, this privacy notice takes precedence. SurveyMonkey Contribute is used by people who are interested in taking surveys on SMC ("
Panelists
") and people who conduct the surveys taken by Panelists ("
Panel Buyers
"). This privacy notice describes how SurveyMonkey collects, uses, shares and secures the personal information you provide. It also describes your choices regarding use, access and correction of your personal information. We refer to surveys conducted through SMC as "Contribute surveys," and these are treated differently to surveys conducted through our
main website
. SMC is a service provided by SurveyMonkey Inc. and its affiliates.
This page is split into two sections: one for
Panelists
, and one for
Panel Buyers
.
PRIVACY FOR PANELISTS
What information does SurveyMonkey collect from Panelists?
Below is a list of information that we collect from you and about you when you use SMC. Information regarding the categories of information we may collect about you or your use of SMC can be found in our
main Privacy Notice
and
Region Specific Privacy Notice (for US residents)
. The sections afterward describe what we do with this information.
Information we receive directly from you
Registration information
: You are required to have a SurveyMonkey account to use SMC as a Panelist. To register for a SurveyMonkey account, we need to collect account information from you (your username, password, and email address).
Profile data
: To allow Panel Buyers to target Panelists with specific characteristics when conducting Contribute surveys, we build profiles of Panelists. We build up your profile by asking you to answer questions about yourself, and from your responses to Contribute surveys that Panel Buyers conduct. We refer to all of this information as "profile data." When compiling profile data, we may collect your demographic information (e.g. year of birth, gender, employment status, the industry in which you work, ethnicity, religion, income level, education level, country of residence, zip code, political views, home ownership status, marital status, number of children, etc.), interests (e.g. what activities you participate in and how often you participate), preferences (e.g. what sort of food or drinks you like) and opinions.
Contribute survey responses
: We receive your survey responses that you submit to Panel Buyers.
Provision of information is voluntary
: You can always choose not to provide any personal information that we ask you for. However, your ability to use SMC may be limited if you do not give information that we require to provide you with our services. For example, if you do not provide profile data, you may be unable to participate in surveys or your chances of being chosen for a survey may be reduced.
You may be asked to provide sensitive information as part of your profile data. When providing answers to sensitive questions (e.g. personal information specifying medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or affiliations, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or information related to one’s sexual preferences), you explicitly consent to the collection of that data. You can opt-out at any time by not answering the question, or choosing “prefer not to say”, which will erase any previous answer to that question. We will treat sensitive information (e.g. personal information specifying medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or affiliations, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or information related to one’s sexual preferences) with particular care. If we intend to disclose such information to a third party or use it for a purpose other than as described in this Contribute Privacy Notice, we will obtain your specific permission to do so prior to any such use or disclosure.
Information we receive about you from other sources
Usage data
: We receive usage data about you whenever you interact with SMC. This may include which webpages you visit, what you click on, and which Contribute surveys you complete. Additionally, like most websites today, our web servers keep log files that record data each time a device accesses those servers. The log files may include Internet service provider (ISP), referring/exit pages, the files viewed on our site (e.g., HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system, date/time stamp, and/or clickstream data to analyze trends in the aggregate and administer the site.
Device data
: We receive data from the device you use to access SMC, such as your IP address and your browser type. We may also infer your geographic location based on your IP address.
How does SurveyMonkey use your information?
Generally, we use your information in connection with providing SMC services to you and to Panel Buyers. More specifically, we use it:
To provide you with relevant surveys
: We use your profile data to target Contribute surveys to you and send you emails inviting you to take those surveys. For example, if the profile data you provide shows you are a 30 year old female living in New York, we may send you a survey where a Panel Buyer is interested in the opinions of any person living in New York aged between 25-35 years.
To improve SMC
: We internally use the data we receive to improve the quality of our service. For example, we use and analyze usage data (such as page view data and response rates) to make the surveys we send more relevant to you, to improve the SMC user interface and to maintain a consistent and reliable user experience. We use profile data to help us to improve the quality of our panel.
To provide Panel Buyers with more targeting criteria
: We may use the responses you give to Contribute surveys to provide other Panel Buyers with more ways to reach the target demographic they want. However, we do not give your actual survey responses to Panel Buyers other than the buyer actually conducting the survey. For example, if you disclose in a Contribute survey that your stock portfolio has 21 stocks, we might allow Panel Buyers to target Panelists based on their stock portfolio size. If a Panel Buyer wanted to target people with stock portfolios with more than 10 stocks and you responded to the survey, the Panel Buyer would know that you have more than 10 stocks in your portfolio. But, we would not share with them the more specific information that you have 21 stocks.
To verify compliance
: We may inspect and use techniques like machine learning on your Contribute survey responses to ensure your compliance with the
SMC Terms of Use
and determine quality responses so we have a consistent and reliable panel.
Who we disclose your information to and what information we share
We recognize that because you give us and allow us to use your profile data and other personal information, we are entrusted with safeguarding the privacy of that information. Your continuing trust is very important to us, so the only time we will disclose or share that information with a third party is where we have:
(a) given you notice (e.g. in this privacy notice);
(b) obtained your consent (e.g. based on your account's opt-in/opt-out settings); or
(c) anonymized the information, so that you cannot reasonably be identified by it.
Our
main Privacy Notice
and
Region Specific Privacy Notice
describe the categories of personal information we may disclose for business purposes or as required by applicable law. In particular, we disclose your:
Survey responses to Panel Buyers
: We host Contribute surveys for Panel Buyers, but they are really the primary curator of survey data. Anything you expressly disclose in your Contribute surveys will, naturally, be provided to them. Panel Buyers may have their own privacy notices which apply to surveys that they create using our services. These policies detail how Panel Buyers handle your information and if one is provided, we encourage you to read it.
Basic demographics to Panel Buyers
: When you respond to a survey, we automatically provide the Panel Buyer with a specific set of information about you that we compile from your profile data for the Panel Buyer. We refer to this set of information as "basic demographics". It includes your:
Region (as produced using zip code)
Device
Income
The sharing of your basic demographics happens behind the scenes and is not visible in the survey questions themselves. We do not include your name or contact details as part of the basic demographics.
Other demographics to Panel Buyers (indirectly)
: Although we do not disclose more than basic demographics to Panel Buyers, because they target their Contribute surveys to specific demographics, they will be able to infer that you belong to this demographic simply because they will only receive responses from that demographic. When selecting the characteristics of desired survey respondents, a Panel Buyer may also receive an indication of how many Panelists match the Panel Buyer's particular demographic requirements for a given survey.
Anonymized Panelist statistics for informational purposes
: We may disclose aggregated, or otherwise anonymized, statistics about our Panelists. For example, we may post on our blog or include in our marketing emails interesting statistics like what the average response rate for Contribute surveys is, or what percentage of Panelists are male. Where data has been de-identified, we commit to preventing future re-identification.
Your information to Service providers.
We may provide your personal information to companies that provide services to help us with our business activities such as offering customer service. These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
Your information if there’s a change in business ownership or structure.
We may transfer your information, including all profile data, account details, other personal information, and responses to surveys, to a successor entity upon a merger, consolidation or other corporate reorganization in which SurveyMonkey participates or to a purchaser of all or substantially all of SurveyMonkey's assets related to SMC. In this event, you will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on our website, of any change in ownership, uses of your personal information, and choices you may have regarding your personal information. We may also disclose your personal information to any other third party with your prior consent.
Disclosures required by law:
We may disclose your information as required or permitted by law, including for purposes of national security and law enforcement, or when we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate fraud, and/or to comply with a judicial proceeding, court order, subpoena, or other legal process served on us.
Are your Contribute survey responses anonymous?
To Panel Buyers, the answer is maybe. Of course, if you disclose your name in a Contribute survey, you won't be anonymous. But even if you don't, the information you do provide may be identifying, such as when combined with other information. Remember that Panel Buyers are also supplied with your basic demographics. To help preserve your privacy, we require a Panel Buyer's targeting criteria to match a certain minimum number of Panelists before we allow the Contribute survey to be conducted.  Please report it to us if you receive a survey that asks you for your email or personal information as we prohibit our Panel Buyers from collecting this information.
To SurveyMonkey, the answer is no. We link your responses back to your username but never fear, we do not abuse or exploit this. We do this to provide Panel Buyers with additional targeting criteria (see "
How does SurveyMonkey use your information?
" above). We do not disclose this link to the Panel Buyer.
Your choices and controls
You can always refuse to answer a survey
: Your participation in any Contribute survey is entirely voluntary and you may opt out of responding at any time.
You can update your information
: If you want to change your profile data,
contact our support team
and we will be happy to help. As a Panelist, you may access and correct certain personal information that SurveyMonkey holds about you by visiting your My Account page from the SMC website.
Some panelists and other individuals (including those whose information we receive under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) have certain legal rights to obtain information of whether we hold personal information about them, to access personal information we hold about them, and to obtain its correction, update, amendment or deletion in appropriate circumstances. For some information, these rights may be exercised through the My Account page mentioned above, and in all cases, requests to exercise these rights may be directed to our customer support team. These rights are subject to some exceptions, such as where giving you access would have an unreasonable impact on the privacy of other individuals. We will respond to your request to exercise these rights within a reasonable time and, where required by law or where we deem it otherwise appropriate and practicable to do so, we will honor your request.
Information related to data collected by Panel Buyers
: If you are a Panelist that has chosen to provide your contact information to one of our Panel Buyers and would no longer like to be contacted by one of our Panel Buyers that use our service or who seeks access, or who seeks to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate information, please contact the Panel Buyer (the data controller) that you interact with directly. Transfers to subsequent third parties are covered by the service agreements with our Panel Buyers.
You can leave SMC and have your SMC information deleted
: If you no longer wish to use SMC, you can request to leave by
contacting our support team
. We will respond to your request within a reasonable timeframe by removing SMC from your SurveyMonkey account and permanently deleting your profile data. You will stop receiving invitations to take Contribute surveys. Any personal information submitted in the past to Contribute surveys will not be deleted - you will need to contact the Panel Buyers who created those surveys to access that data. Note that leaving SMC will not delete your main SurveyMonkey account.
Data retention
: We may retain your information (including the information we process on behalf of our Panel Buyers) for as long as your account is active or as needed to provide you services, comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our agreements.
Rights and choices under local laws:
Your local laws may extend additional rights and choices to you. Please review the “Your rights” section of our
main Privacy Notice
for further details.
Security
The security of your personal information is important to us. We follow generally accepted standards to protect the personal information submitted to us, both during transmission and once it is received. If you have any questions about the security of your personal information, you can
contact our support team
.
Notice of Financial Incentives
SurveyMonkey provides certain rewards or incentives for Panelists to provide responses to surveys. You can opt into the rewards or incentives by registering for a SurveyMonkey account and answering Contribute surveys using your account credentials. Your participation is completely voluntary, and you have a right to withdraw from Contribute at any time. If you decide you don’t want to participate, you can refrain from submitting responses to Contribute surveys, or you can close your SurveyMonkey account.
The specific reward or incentive offered, if any, is made available to you when you provide responses to available Contribute surveys - including completing your profile survey - and may vary based on the length of the Contribute survey and other factors identified below. The monetary value of the reward or incentive is a reasonable approximation of the monetary value of your survey responses to us. We have arrived at this estimate based on consideration of multiple factors, including the following: (1) revenue generated by SurveyMonkey in providing aggregated and/or anonymized responses and insights to customers; (2) expenses incurred by SurveyMonkey in operating Contribute; and (3) our reasonable assessment of revenue we may generate as a result of SurveyMonkey providing aggregated and/or anonymized responses and insights to customers.
PRIVACY FOR PANEL BUYERS
What information does SurveyMonkey collect from Panel Buyers?
Below is a list of information that we collect from you and about you when you create and conduct a Contribute survey. Information regarding the categories of information we may collect about you or your use of SMC can be found in our
main Privacy Notice
. The sections afterward describe what we do with this information.
Information we collect directly from you
Registration information
: You are required to have a SurveyMonkey account to use SMC as a Panel Buyer. To register for a SurveyMonkey account, we need to collect account information from you (your username, password, and email address).
Information we receive about you from other sources
Device data
: We receive data from the device you use to access the website, such as your IP address and your browser type. We may also infer your geographic location based on your IP address.
Contribute surveys
Survey data
: We store your Contribute survey data (questions and responses) on your behalf.
How does SurveyMonkey use your information?
Generally, we use your information in connection with providing SMC services to you and to Panelists. More specifically, we use it:
To improve SMC
: We internally use the data we receive to improve the quality of our service. For example, we use and analyze usage data (such as page view data and response rates) to make the surveys we send more relevant to Panelists, to improve the SMC user interface and to maintain a consistent and reliable user experience. We also may use techniques like machine learning on your survey responses for ensuring your compliance with the
SMC Terms of Use
and detecting their quality to maintain reliable Panelists.
To provide Panel Buyers with more targeting criteria
: We may use your Contribute survey data to give you and other Panel Buyers more ways to reach the target demographic you want in your future Contribute surveys. For example, if you ask "How high can you jump?" we may give other Panel Buyers the ability to target Panelists who can jump more than, say, 2 feet high (based on the responses your survey respondents gave). Other Panel Buyers have no access to your survey data - they will not be able to determine that the question originated from your Contribute survey. We don't use your survey responses for any other purpose.
Who we disclose your information to and what information we share
While you allow us to use your survey data and other information in accordance with this privacy notice, you always own all of your survey data and we regard it as information which is confidential to you. Your continuing trust is very important to us, so the only time we will disclose or share that information to a third party is where we have:
(a) given you notice (e.g. in this privacy notice);
(b) obtained your consent (e.g. based on your account's opt-in/opt-out settings);
(c) anonymized the information, so that you cannot reasonably be identified by it; or
(d) fulfilled a Panelist’s data access request to include providing their responses to them.
Our
main Privacy Notice
describes the categories of personal information we may disclose for business purposes or as required by applicable law. In particular, we disclose your:
Survey questions to other Panel Buyers
: To provide Panel Buyers with additional targeting criteria. While Panel Buyers may be able to see your individual questions, they will not be able to determine that they originated from your Contribute survey.
Survey responses to no one
: Except for a narrow set of reasons set out in the main
SurveyMonkey Privacy Notice
(e.g. if we are compelled by law).
Anonymized Contribute survey information for informational purposes
: We may disclose aggregated, or otherwise anonymized, information about Contribute surveys. For example, we may post on our blog or otherwise include in our marketing emails interesting statistics like how many surveys were completed in a month, or what the average length of a Contribute survey was. Where data has been de-identified, we commit to preventing future re-identification.
Disclosures due to change in business ownership or structure
: We may transfer your information, including all profile data, account details, other personal information, and responses to surveys, to a successor entity upon a merger, consolidation or other corporate reorganization in which SurveyMonkey participates or to a purchaser of all or substantially all of SurveyMonkey's assets related to SMC. In this event, you will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on our website, of any change in ownership, uses of your personal information, and choices you may have regarding your personal information. We may also disclose your personal information to any other third party with your prior consent.
Disclosures required by law
: We may disclose your information as required or permitted by law, including for purposes of national security and law enforcement, or when we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate fraud, and/or to comply with a judicial proceeding, court order, subpoena, or other legal process served on us.
Your choices and controls
You can delete your survey data
: Just like any regular SurveyMonkey survey, you have control over your Contribute surveys and can delete them at any time through our website.
EU Users
: Other individuals (including Panelists and those whose information we receive under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) have certain legal rights to obtain information of whether we hold personal information about them, to access personal information we hold about them, and to obtain its correction, update, amendment or deletion in appropriate circumstances. For some information, these rights may be exercised through your account management page, and in all cases, requests to exercise these rights may be directed to our customer support team. These rights are subject to some exceptions, such as where giving you access would have an unreasonable impact on the privacy of other individuals. We will respond to your request to exercise these rights within a reasonable time and, where required by law or where we deem it otherwise appropriate and practicable to do so, we will honor your request.
Rights and choices under local laws:
Your local laws may extend additional rights and choices to you. Please review the “Your rights” section of our
main Privacy Notice
for further details.
Your opt-out preferences
When you register for an account, we will use your name and email address to send periodic emails to you of both promotional and transactional in nature. Out of respect for your privacy, you may choose to stop receiving promotional emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails or you can
contact our support team
.
We will also send you service related email announcements on rare occasions when it is necessary to do so. For instance, if our service is temporarily suspended for maintenance, we might send you an email. You do not have an option to opt out of these emails, which are not promotional in nature.
Cookies / Tracking Technologies
SurveyMonkey and its partners use cookies or similar technologies to analyze trends, administer the website, track users’ movements around the website, and to gather demographic information about our user base as a whole. You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level, but if you choose to disable cookies, it may limit your use of certain features or functions on our website or service.
Behavioral Targeting
. We may ask advertising networks and exchanges to display ads promoting our services on other websites. We may ask them to deliver those ads based on the presence of a cookie, but in doing so will not share any other personal information with the advertiser. Our advertising network partners may use cookies and page tags or web beacons to collect certain information about your activities on this and other websites to provide you with targeted advertising based upon your interests. If you do not wish to have this information used for the purpose of serving you such targeted ads, you may opt-out at
http://preferences-mgr.truste.com/
. If you opt out, please be advised that you may continue to receive generic ads.
OTHER THINGS TO NOTE
Where your information is processed and stored
:  Your personal information may be stored and processed in the United States, Australia or any other country where SurveyMonkey or its service providers maintain facilities. You can view a list of these locations in our
EU Data Transfer Statement
. We enter into standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission with our international group companies to ensure the transfer of your personal information to the US complies with data protection legislation (you can
contact us
for further information).  Our parent company, SurveyMonkey Inc. has self-certified its compliance under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Changes to this privacy notice
: We may modify this privacy notice at any time, but if we do so, we will notify you by publishing the changes on this website. If we determine the changes are material, we will provide you with additional, prominent notice as is appropriate under the circumstance, such as via email.
Children under 18
: SMC is not intended for, and may not be used by children under the age of 18. Children under 18 are not permitted to register with SurveyMonkey or to be a Panelist.
Online tracking
: We currently do not process or comply with any web browser's "do not track" signal or other similar mechanism that indicates a request to disable online tracking of individual users who visit the SurveyMonkey Contribute website or use SurveyMonkey Contribute.
For questions regarding our privacy notice or practices, contact SurveyMonkey electronically at
privacy@surveymonkey.com
. You may also contact us by mail at 910 Park Pl, Suite 300, San Mateo, CA 94403, USA if you are located in the United States, or at Ella House, Suite 40.4, 40 Merrion Square East, Dublin 2, D02 NP96, Ireland if you are located elsewhere.
Sub-policy 4
https://www.surveymonkey.com/rewards/privacy_statement/?ut_source=legal&ut_source2=privacy-information-specific-to-other-services&ut_source3=inline:
Help
Your Account
Login & Password
SurveyMonkey Mobile Apps
SurveyMonkey
SurveyMonkey Mobile Apps
We are currently updating the way you
log in to your account
. If you need to switch between accounts on your mobile device, refer to the Common Questions section below.
SurveyMonkey has three mobile apps available for download.
Common Questions
I want to switch to a different account on the mobile app
To switch to a different account:
Visit
SurveyMonkey.com
through a browser on your mobile device.
Log in to the account you wish to switch to.
Return to the SurveyMonkey Mobile app you're using, and log out of your current account.
Log in to the app again.
Managing AI Feature Access
Two-factor Authentication (2FA)
Logging in to Your Account
Sub-policy 5
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/third-party-panelist-privacy-notice/:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
LAST UPDATED: October 31, 2024
1. When this notice applies
SurveyMonkey uses third party trusted partners (“
Panel Providers
”) to source individuals who are willing to complete surveys (“
Panelists
”) so that we can then deliver surveys from SurveyMonkey Customers (
“SurveyMonkey Customers”
or
“Customers”
) to those Panelists.
This Third Party Privacy Notice (“
Notice
”) applies to you as a Panelist if you complete a survey through one of our Panel Providers for a SurveyMonkey Customer.
If you complete a survey from a SurveyMonkey Customer and provide personal data, that Customer is the controller/business responsible for collecting and processing your personal data in compliance with data protection law, and SurveyMonkey acts as the processor/service provider. We also refer to SurveyMonkey Customers as the survey “
Creator
” in this Notice.
2. Why did I receive a SurveyMonkey survey?
The most likely scenario is that you have signed up to take surveys through a third party Panel Provider in return for some type of incentive. We partner with Panel Providers who source Panelists like you to take surveys for our Creators. We do not get your personal contact information or your name from our Panel Providers. They facilitate us (or the Creator) forwarding surveys to you to take.
The Panel Provider who forwards you to a survey to complete will also be responsible for protecting your personal data and will likely have its own privacy notice which you should consult.
3. Personal data we collect
Data Matching the Panelist Profile
We provide our Panel Provider with a profile of the type of Panelist our Customers wish to use for a particular survey. This may include requirements such as (on a non-exhaustive basis) Panelists of a particular gender, age or age range, income bracket or location. If you respond to a particular survey, we will know that you have (or that it is likely you have) the characteristics or match the details listed in the Panelist profile. We do not actively seek to re-identify you through use of this demographic data and so our intent is that this does not constitute personal data.
Survey Response Data
We collect your survey response data which may directly identify you (if you share personal data in your answers) or which, when used with other information which we hold about you, may make it possible to identify you. For more details of how we treat survey responses generally,
see our main Privacy Notice
. We do not actively seek to identify you through your responses or use your responses in conjunction with demographic data.
Metadata
We receive data from the device you use to access surveys, such as your operating system version, device manufacturer and model, carrier (i.e., mobile provider), system locale. We may also store any information collected by the core SDK, like device name (can be personalized by device owner) and user agent string.
We also collect data through the use of cookies. Please see our
cookies notice
for more information
4. How and why we process your personal data
Purposes
We may use personal data or other non-identifying information to:
check that you only take a particular survey once (unless the Creator allows multiple responses);
understand what type of Panelists are taking particular surveys without identifying individual Panelists;
customize the way that surveys are presented to you to enhance your survey taking experience;
analyze survey responses (including by comparing your responses against other Panelists' responses);
analyze aggregate trends both amongst Panelists and other survey respondents from de-identified data. We may use this information for our own business purposes or sell this aggregate, de-identified information to third parties for commercial reasons. Where data has been de-identified, we commit to preventing future re-identification;
track referring websites;
maintain our processing records;
perform system administration and maintenance including copying, modifying and configuring data for business continuity and archiving purposes and in order to introduce new technologies into our systems;
maintain the security of our system (e.g. controlling abuse, spam and DDOS attacks); and
direct Panel Providers to send/not send you specific surveys.
Machine Learning
We also may use techniques like machine learning on your survey responses for improving and enhancing our services, determining their quality and compliance with the relevant terms of service between SurveyMonkey and Panel Providers so that SurveyMonkey can maintain consistent and reliable Panelists.
Who We Share Your Data With
Survey Creator
Your survey responses will be shared with the Creator of the survey that requested the survey. While in limited cases the Creators may be able to identify you based on your responses and your IP address, generally we prohibit these parties from: (i) asking survey questions which elicit responses with your name, email address and contact information; (ii) contacting you for marketing or any other purpose (unless you have voluntarily agreed to this); or (iii) from disclosing your identity to other third parties.  In limited circumstances, we permit the Creator to ask you for additional information (name, email address and contact information) which you may give voluntarily, to allow you to further participate in research with that Creator outside our platform.  If the Creator asks you for information other than name, email or contact information please contact us, as we do not permit the collection of additional data.
SurveyMonkey Group
The information which we collect about you will be shared with other companies in the SurveyMonkey group from time to time.
De-identified Information
We may publish our analysis of survey responses and the results of our research. Such publications will not contain your personal data.
Legal Basis
Contract
We will process your personal data in order to fulfill our contracts with Creators and Panel Providers.
Legitimate Interest
We will process your personal data to provide you with surveys which it appears you are interested in receiving based on your previous survey-taking activities and the profile we have developed for you as a result of this usage history.
We also have a legitimate commercial interest to use your personal data in order to administer the survey and to improve both the content and frequency of future surveys and how these surveys are presented to you.
In the event of a corporate transaction involving the SurveyMonkey group (or any part of the SurveyMonkey group) such as a merger or sale of assets, we may share your personal data with a prospective purchaser.
Legal Obligation
We may disclose your personal data to comply with laws applicable to us or to respond to legal process or lawful requests, including from law enforcement and government agencies.
Vital Interests
In rare events, we may disclose your personal data where we believe in good faith that access or disclosure is necessary to protect the personal safety or vital interests of SurveyMonkey employees, customers or the public.
Retention
To the extent we independently keep any data about you which we collected from you as a respondent to surveys sent from our service, we will retain that data to continue to provide our services to you. To the extent that your survey responses are stored in one of our Customer accounts, that data is retained for as long as our Customer’s account remains active or until our Customer has deleted those survey responses. Where an account is inactive for 3 or more years we take steps to close those accounts and delete any data contained in them.
5. Where your information is processed and stored
Your personal data may be stored and processed in the United States, Australia or any other country where the SurveyMonkey group or its service providers maintain facilities. We enter into standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission with our international group companies to ensure the safe transfer of your personal data to include the US. For more information, please see our
EU Data Transfer and Subprocessor Statement
.
6. Your rights
If SurveyMonkey is your controller and collects personal data that we can use to uniquely identify you, you have certain data subject rights as discussed below. For rights and choices specific to US consumers, please refer to our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
. Please note we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and the authenticity of your request as described in that Notice.
If a SurveyMonkey Customer is your controller, please reach out to them directly. If you are having difficulties finding this Creator or if you have any other questions after reading this Privacy Notice, you can
contact us through our support team
and we will try our best to help you.
If you have not provided any personal data, please reach out to the third party Panel Provider with questions about your Data Subject rights.
Right of Access
You can find out what kind of personal data we hold about you and what we do with that information. You can also get a copy of this information.
Right to Rectification
You can have us update or correct any inaccurate personal data which we hold about you.
Right to Data Portability
Receive a copy of the information which you have provided to us in a form which makes it easy for you to give this information to a different organization.
Right to Restrict Use
You have a right to stop us from using your personal data in certain cases, including if you believe that the personal data we hold about you is incorrect or our use of your information is unlawful. If you exercise this right, we will store your personal data and will not carry out any active processing unless your issue is resolved.
Right to Object
Where we rely on our legitimate business interests to use your personal data, you have a right to object to this use and to have your personal data deleted. We may disagree with any objection you raise but we will stop processing your personal data until we sort out the issue with you.
Right to Erasure
In certain circumstances, you may also have your personal data deleted, for example if you exercise your right to object (see above) and we do not have any overriding reason to process your personal data or if we no longer require your personal information for the purposes set out in this notice.
7. Complaints
For Panelists in Europe, if you are not satisfied with any response you receive from us or have an issue with the way we handle your personal data, you can make a complaint to the Office of the Data Protection Commissioner in Ireland. You can contact this office by emailing
info@dataprotection.ie
.
For Panelists in the US or elsewhere please contact our support team
here
.
8. Changes to this notice
We may occasionally update this Notice to reflect Customer feedback and changes in its business or to comply with applicable law and regulations. When we make such an update, we will revise the “last updated” date at the top of this privacy notice. If there are material changes to this Notice concerning how we will handle your personal data, we will notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes before they take effect or by directly sending you a notification.
9. Contacting us
For general SurveyMonkey privacy issues, or to submit feedback or ask us questions about our privacy practices and this Notice, please contact our Data Protection Officer
here
or by mail at Attn: Data Protection Officer, Ella House, Suite 40.4, 40 Merrion Square East, Dublin 2, D02 NP96, Ireland.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 7
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/How-to-Submit-a-Complaint-Relating-to-a-Participating-Organization-s-Compliance-with-the-DPF-Principles-dpf:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 8
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/survey-research-privacy-notice/?ut_source=legal&ut_source2=privacy&ut_source3=inline:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
SurveyMonkey Research Privacy Notice
LAST UPDATED: October 31, 2024
This privacy notice only applies to surveys conducted by and forms created by SurveyMonkey (or on our behalf by third parties). Such surveys and forms are intended for and may only be taken by adults aged 18 and over in the United States. This privacy notice does not apply to data collected by third parties which are not collected on SurveyMonkey's behalf or upon our instruction.
If you're in the United States, SurveyMonkey Inc. is responsible for your responses.
If you're outside the United States, SurveyMonkey Europe UC is responsible for holding and keeping your personal information in compliance with data protection law.
Personal information SurveyMonkey collects
SurveyMonkey collects personal information from you if you choose to participate in a survey or submit a form.
SurveyMonkey collects the following types of personal information:
Your responses to survey questions and form fields.
Contact details which you may provide, such as your name or email address.
Device and browser data: We collect information from the device and application you use to access our services. Device data mainly means your IP address, operating system version, device type, device ID/MAC address, system and performance information, and browser type. If you are on a mobile device we also collect the UUID for that device.
Usage information: We collect usage information about you whenever you interact with our websites and services. This includes which webpages you visit, what you click on, when you perform those actions, what language preference you have, what you buy and so on.
Log Data: Like most websites today, our web servers keep log files that record data each time a device accesses those servers. The log files contain data about the nature of each access, including originating IP addresses, internet service providers, the files viewed on our site (e.g. HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system versions, device type and timestamps.
Referral information: If you arrive at a SurveyMonkey website from an external source (such as a link on another website or in an email), we record information about the source that referred you to us.
Information from page tags: We use first party and third party cookies and tracking services that employ cookies and page tags (also known as
web beacons
) to collect data about visitors to our websites. This data includes usage and user statistics.  We provide more information on cookies  in our
Cookies Notice
. You can choose to
remove or disable cookies
in your browser. Please note that doing this may adversely impact the survey taking experience.
Why SurveyMonkey collects personal information
Your survey and form responses may be used by SurveyMonkey for research and/or commercial purposes. SurveyMonkey may use the collected information to administer the survey or form, to improve future surveys or form by, for example, looking at trends regarding how groups in particular locations respond to particular questions. SurveyMonkey may also use your personal information for other purposes if you have given your consent for us to do so, such as contacting you regarding participation in future research.
When SurveyMonkey collects personal information
You don't have to take a survey or submit a form. But, if you do take a survey or submit a form, you acknowledge that SurveyMonkey collects and uses your data for the legitimate interests and purposes described in this Privacy Notice. For example, we may use your personal information to administer the survey or form and to improve future surveys and forms. We will also analyze aggregate trends and survey and form results both for our own purposes and for commercial reasons.
Other organizations who receive personal information
Third Parties
We may use trusted third party agents to help us conduct research and in such cases we enter into specific data protection and confidentiality terms with those agents to ensure they protect your personal data to the same levels as SurveyMonkey. We may also share your survey and form responses with third parties, such as media firms, financial services, or market research firms. Except where you intentionally direct us to share your identifiable information with third parties—such as when you consent to us sharing your contact information with one of these third parties or where you affirmatively include identifiable information in a survey response (e.g. include your name or email address in answering a survey)—we will not share information that identifies you, such as your name or email address. Even where you intentionally direct us to share your identifiable information with third parties, SurveyMonkey contractually prohibits such third parties from disclosing your identity to other third parties.
Affiliates
SurveyMonkey may disclose the personal information you provide to its affiliates.
Other Situations
SurveyMonkey may disclose your personal information in the following situations:
To comply with the law or respond to legal process or lawful requests, including from law enforcement and government agencies.
To protect the rights or property of SurveyMonkey or our customers, including to combat fraud or protect SurveyMonkey's interests, or to enforce the terms governing your use of the services.
As part of a corporate transaction such as a merger or sale of assets.
Where SurveyMonkey believes in good faith that access or disclosure is necessary to protect the personal safety of SurveyMonkey employees, customers, or the public.
De-identified information
SurveyMonkey may publish our analysis of survey or form responses and the results of our research. Such publications will not contain your personal information. Where data has been de-identified, we commit to preventing future re-identification.
Where personal information is processed and stored
Your information and data may be processed in and transferred or disclosed in the United States and countries in which our affiliates are located and in which our service providers are located or have servers. You can view a list of these locations in our
EU Data Transfer Statement
. We ensure that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of protection, for instance, by entering into the appropriate back-to-back agreements with standard contractual clauses or other transfer mechanisms as approved by the European Commission or relevant data protection authority.
How long we use your data
We only retain data about you for the period necessary for us to gain useful insights from that data and fulfill the uses described in this privacy notice. Generally, we won’t retain personal data about you for more than 3 years from the last date you responded to a survey or submitted a form—unless we have a legal reason requiring us to retain it for longer.
Your rights
SurveyMonkey is happy to assist you in exercising your rights under data protection law. Please bear in mind that research surveys typically gather limited personal data. In the event that there isn’t sufficient data to identify your unique response, we may not be able to fulfill the request.
You can contact us at any time in order to:
Find out what kind of personal information SurveyMonkey holds about you and what we do with that information.
Get a copy of the personal information which SurveyMonkey holds about you.
Have SurveyMonkey update or correct any inaccurate personal information.
Receive a copy of the information which you have provided to us in a form which makes it easy for you to give this information to a different organization.
Take back your consent to SurveyMonkey using your personal information and have your information deleted (please note, if you take back your consent, this will not affect our use of your personal information before you notified us that you no longer consent).
Stop SurveyMonkey from using your personal information if you believe that the personal information we hold about you is incorrect or our use of your information is unlawful.
If you are a US resident, please visit our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
for more information about our use of your personal information.
Contacting SurveyMonkey
For general SurveyMonkey privacy issues, or to submit feedback or ask SurveyMonkey questions about its privacy practices and this privacy notice, please contact us by mail, or you can contact us
here
.
Within the United States:
SurveyMonkey Inc.
910 Park Pl, Suite 300
San Mateo, California 94403
United States
Outside the United States:
Attn: Data Protection Officer
SurveyMonkey Europe UC
Ella House, Suite 40.4
40 Merrion Square East
Dublin 2
D02 NP96
Ireland
Making a Complaint in Europe
If you are based in Europe and you are not satisfied with any response you receive from us or have an issue with the way we handle your personal information, you can make a complaint to the Office of the Data Protection Commissioner in Ireland. You can contact this office by emailing
info@dataprotection.ie
.
Updating this Privacy Notice
SurveyMonkey may occasionally update this privacy notice to reflect customer feedback and changes in its business or to comply with applicable laws and regulations. When SurveyMonkey makes such an update, SurveyMonkey will revise the "last updated" date at the top of this privacy notice. If there are material changes to this privacy notice concerning how SurveyMonkey will handle your personal information, SurveyMonkey will notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes before they take effect or by directly sending you a notification, when possible.
Sub-policy 9
https://www.salesforce.com/company/privacy/:
Skip to content
See Privacy Statement
How we protect our Customer’s data as a Processor
Our cloud services are designed to help customers comply with privacy laws around the world. Discover more about our commitment to protecting customer data as a processor.
Global Privacy Resources for Salesforce Products
Data Processing Addendum
Data Processing Addendum FAQ
Data Transfer Mechanisms FAQ
Salesforce's Notice of Data Privacy Framework Certification
Trust and Compliance Documentation
Salesforce Audience Studio Privacy Policy
Salesforce's Notice of APEC CBPR and PRP Certifications
Salesforce's EU Processor Binding Corporate Rules
Salesforce's UK Processor Binding Corporate Rules
Salesforce Group Affiliates for UK Binding Corporate Rules for Processors
How we protect data as a Controller
We continuously monitor the global privacy landscape and adapt our privacy program accordingly. Discover more about our commitment to compliance with global privacy laws as a controller
Salesforce Candidate Privacy Statement
Salesforce Apps, Add-ins and Extensions Privacy Statement
Contact Information
To exercise your rights relating to your personal data, or if you have questions regarding our privacy practices, please fill out
this form
, or email us at
privacy@salesforce.com.
For more information about contacting us, see the “Contacting Us” section below.
Learn more
Important Information
Salesforce’s full Privacy Statement contains more information about Salesforce’s privacy practices.
Responsible Salesforce Entity
Salesforce, Inc. and/or its affiliated entities act as the controllers of your Personal Data and are responsible for its processing, unless expressly specified otherwise in our full Privacy Statement. For the avoidance of doubt, our Privacy Statement does not apply to the extent we process Personal Data in the role of a processor on behalf of our customers. A reference to “Salesforce,” “we,” “us” or the “Company” is a reference to Salesforce, Inc. and its affiliates involved in the processing activity. A list of Salesforce’s affiliates can be found in the List of Subsidiaries section of Salesforce’s most recent Form 10-K, available under the SEC Filings tab by selecting the “Annual Filings” filter on the page located here. Please see the "Contacting us" section, below, for our contact information and details of our Data Protection Officer (and in India, our Grievance Officer).
Purposes for which we process Personal Data
We collect and process Personal Data for a variety of purposes, including:
to provide our websites and social media branded pages;
to display personalized advertisements and content;
to manage event registrations and attendance (including ensuring the health and safety of our visitors and employees);
to send communications;
to handle contact and user support requests;
to provide and optimize the performance of our services;
to bill for our services and manage our accounts (including usage and licensing compliance);
to administer surveys and conduct research; and
to comply with our legal obligations.
For the list of purposes for which we Process your Personal Data, please see the full Privacy Statement.
We only collect and process your Personal Data to the extent it is necessary for fulfilling these purposes and where we can rely on a legal basis for such processing as set out in our full Privacy Statement. Where required, we will ask you for your prior consent to processing.
Please review the "What Personal Data do we collect?" and "Purposes for which we process Personal Data and the legal bases on which we rely" sections in our full Privacy Statement for further details. Also, please review the "How long do we keep your Personal Data?" section to learn how long we store your Personal Data.
Who do we share Personal Data with
We may share Personal Data with various parties, including:
Our contracted service providers that process Personal Data on our behalf for IT and system administration, credit card processing, research and analytics, marketing, customer support and data enrichment;
Affiliates within our current or future corporate group that process Personal Data for customer support, marketing, event management, technical operations and account management;
If you are using our services as an authorized user, with the Salesforce customer responsible for your access to the services for verifying your account, and reviewing compliance with our usage terms and policies;
Sponsors of events, webinar or contests for which you register;
Third-party networks and websites so that we can advertise on their platforms;
Specifically in relation to our AppExchange website, with our third-party partners who may contact you regarding their products or services; and
Professional advisers who provide consultancy, banking, legal, insurance and accounting services.
Please review the "Who do we share Personal Data with" section in our full Privacy Statement for the full list and more detailed information.
International transfer of Personal Data
Your Personal Data may be collected, transferred to and stored by us in the United States and by our affiliates and third parties (as disclosed in the full Privacy Statement) in other countries. Therefore, your Personal Data may be processed outside your  country or jurisdiction, including in places that may not provide the same level of protection. As described in the "International transfer of Personal Data" section of our full Privacy Statement, we have implemented safeguards to ensure an adequate level of protection where your Personal Data is transferred.
Data Transfer Mechanisms FAQ
Your rights relating to Personal Data
You have certain rights relating to your Personal Data, subject to local data protection laws. Depending on the applicable laws, these rights may include the right to:
Access your Personal Data held by us;
Know more about how we process your Personal Data;
Rectify inaccurate Personal Data and, taking into account the purpose of processing the Personal Data, ensure it is complete;
Erase or delete your Personal Data;
Restrict our processing of your Personal Data;
Transfer your Personal Data to another controller, to the extent possible;
Object to any processing of your Personal Data;
Opt out of certain disclosures of your Personal Data to third parties;
Know what categories of Personal Data are shared for delivering advertisements on non Salesforce websites, applications, and services and the categories of recipients of such Personal Data;
Opt out of the sharing of your Personal Data for delivering advertisements on non-Salesforce websites, applications, and services;
If you’re under the age of 16, or such other applicable age of consent for privacy purposes in relevant individual jurisdictions, opt in to certain disclosures of your Personal Data to third parties;
Not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects;
Withdraw your consent at any time (to the extent we base processing on consent); and
Not be discriminated against for exercising your rights as described above.
For more details on your rights and choices and how to exercise them, please review the "Your rights relating to your Personal Data" section in our full Privacy Statement.
Contacting us
To exercise your rights relating to your Personal Data, or if you have questions regarding our privacy practices, please fill out
this form
, email us at
privacy@salesforce.com
or
datasubjectrequest@salesforce.com
, call us at tel:1-855-938-3410 or write to us at:
Salesforce Data Protection Officer (Salesforce Privacy Team) (and in India, a Grievance Officer)
415 Mission St., 3rd Floor
San Francisco, CA 94105, USA
When you contact us, please indicate in which country and/or state you reside.
If you believe that we have not been able to assist with your complaint or concern, and you are located in the EEA or the UK, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the competent supervisory authority. If you work or reside in a country that is a member of the European Union or that is in the EEA, you may find the contact details for your appropriate data protection authority on the
following website
.
Situations
Categories of Personal Data
If you express an interest in obtaining additional information about our services; request customer support (including accessing the Help & Training Portal); use our “Contact Us” or similar features; register to use our websites or to receive communications; sign up for an event, webinar or contest; participate in a program, training, certification or survey; use our products and services; download certain content; or are employed by a customer of our products and services where your information has been shared with us
Contact information, such as your name, job title, company name, address, phone number, email address, username and password, other information you have voluntarily chosen to share
If you make purchases via our websites or register for an event or webinar
Contact information, financial and billing information, such as billing name and address, credit card number or bank account information
If you attend an event
Attendee badge information which may include name, title, company name, address, country, phone number and email address, image and video
If you give your explicit consent and only for specified events, your biometric information, such as an image of your facial features for identification purposes
During the Covid-19 pandemic, this may also include health status, including your temperature, COVID-19-related symptoms, exposure to COVID-19 positive individuals, vaccination status, testing results, and recent travel history
If you register with us for a variety of purposes, including joining a community that we host or participating in a program, training or certification
Username, photo, video or other biographical information, such as your occupation, location, social media profiles or usernames, company name, areas of expertise and interests
If you interact with our websites or emails
Information about your device and your usage of our websites or emails (such as Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or other identifiers), which may qualify as Personal Data (please see Section 4 below) using cookies, web beacons, or similar technologies
If you use and interact with our products and services
Information about your device and your usage of our services through log files and other technologies, some of which may qualify as Personal Data (including Usage Data) (please see Section 4 below)
If you communicate with us via a phone call
Information such as your name, voice and any other Personal Data voluntarily share
If you visit our offices
Name, email address, phone number, company name, time and date of arrival, image or video
During the Covid-19 pandemic, this may also include health status, including your temperature, COVID-19-related symptoms, exposure to COVID-19 positive individuals, vaccination status, testing results, and recent travel history
If you voluntarily submit certain information to us, such as filling out a survey, responding to a questionnaire or participating in other forms of research
Information you have provided as part of that request, which may include Personal Data and special categories of Personal Data, to the extent you voluntarily choose to provide it
If you are a supplier or service provider to Salesforce (or work for a supplier or service provider)
Contact information, payment and billing information
If you provide us, our service providers or our affiliates with any Personal Data relating to other individuals, you represent that you have the authority to do so, and where required, have obtained the necessary consent, and acknowledge that it may be used in accordance with this Privacy Statement. If you believe that your Personal Data has been provided to us improperly, or want to exercise your rights relating to your Personal Data, please contact us by using the information in Section 13 below.
3.2 Personal Data we collect from other sources
We also collect information about you from other sources including partners from whom we collect or purchase Personal Data or who provide us with publicly available information which may contain Personal Data. We may combine this information with Personal Data provided by you.
Provision of the services:
The Personal Data we collect to provide our products and services may include information you have made publicly available online (such as when using social media sites) or that is published by third parties and contains information about you (such as news articles). For a select number of services, we collect this Personal Data from partners who may receive this data when you visit or use their services or through the third parties they work with.
In addition, the Personal Data we collect to provide our products and services may include location information from third parties, which helps us offer features like identity management and multi-factor authentication.
Advertising: The Personal Data we collect from other sources for the purposes of tailored advertising includes identifiers, professional or employment-related information, education information, commercial information, visual information, internet activity information, and inferences about preferences and behaviors. We, collect this from third party providers of business contact information, including mailing addresses, job titles, email addresses, phone numbers, intent data (or user behavior data), IP addresses, social media profiles, LinkedIn URLs and custom profiles for purposes of targeted advertising, delivering relevant email content, event promotion and profiling, determining eligibility and verifying contact information. This helps us update, expand, and analyze our records, identify new customers, and create more tailored advertising to provide services that may be of interest to you.
Additional sources: In addition to the aforementioned, we collect Personal Data from the following sources:
Another individual at your organization who may provide us with your personal information, which may include Personal Data and special categories of Personal Data, to the extent you consent to providing it and sharing it, for the purposes of obtaining services and assessing our goals related to encouraging diversity within our vendors; and
Platforms such as GitHub to manage code check-ins and pull requests. If you participate in an open-source or community development project, we may associate your code repository username with your community account so we can inform you of program changes that are important to your participation or relate to additional security requirements.
Only where necessary for security purposes, we may collect information that is publicly available online (such as accessible through search engines or public social media sites), as well as images, physical descriptions and other pertinent information necessary to address a credible security threat to our employees, events or premises.
Type of Cookies
Description
Managing Settings
Required cookies
Required cookies are necessary for basic website functionality. Some examples include: session cookies needed to transmit the website, authentication cookies, and security cookies.
If you have chosen to identify yourself to us, we may place on your browser a cookie that allows us to uniquely identify you when you are logged into the websites and to process your online transactions and requests.
Because required cookies are essential to operate the websites, there is no option to opt out of these cookies.
Functional cookies
Functional cookies enhance functions, performance, and services on the website. Some examples include: cookies used to analyze site traffic, cookies used for market research, and cookies used to display advertising that is not directed to a particular individual.
Functional cookies may also be used to improve how our websites function and to help us provide you with more relevant communications, including marketing communications. These cookies collect information about how our websites are used, including which pages are viewed most often.
We may use our own technology or third-party technology to track and analyze usage information to provide enhanced interactions and more relevant communications, and to track the performance of our advertisements.
Salesforce may also use HTML5 local storage or Flash cookies for the above-mentioned purposes. These technologies differ from browser cookies in the amount and type of data they store, and how they store it.
We need your prior consent to use functional cookies. To change your cookie settings and preferences, including those for functional cookies, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page.
To learn how to control functional cookies via your individual browser settings, click
here
.
To learn how to manage privacy and storage settings for Flash cookies, click
here
.
Advertising cookies
Advertising cookies track activity across websites in order to understand a viewer’s interests and to direct marketing to them.
We sometimes use cookies delivered by us or by third parties to show you ads for our products that we think may interest you on devices you use and to track the performance of our advertisements. For example, these cookies collect information such as which browser you used when visiting our websites.
Salesforce also contracts with third-party advertising networks that collect IP addresses and other information from web beacons on our websites, from emails and on third-party websites. Advertising networks follow your online activities over time and across different websites or other online services by collecting certain data through automated means, including through the use of cookies. These technologies may recognize you across the different devices you use. When we work with third party advertising networks, we require them to restrict their data processing to only what is necessary to provide us with the advertising services we request.
We need your prior consent to use of targeting and advertising cookies. To change your cookie settings and preferences, including those for targeting and advertising cookies, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page.
See Section 4.3, below, to learn more about these and other advertising networks and your ability to opt out of collection by certain third parties.
For more information about Tableau and Slack’s use of cookies specifically, please see the
Tableau Cookie Policy
and the
Slack Cookie Policy
.
4.3 Notices on behavioral advertising and opt-out for website visitors
As described above, we or one of our authorized partners may place or read cookies on your device when you visit our websites for the purpose of serving you targeted advertising (also referred to as “online behavioral advertising” or “interest-based advertising”). To learn more about targeted advertising and advertising networks, please visit the opt-out pages of the Network Advertising Initiative,
here
, and the Digital Advertising Alliance,
here
. To opt-out of targeted advertising that is provided to us and to third parties by Salesforce Audience Studio, click
here
.
To manage the use of targeting and advertising cookies on this website, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page or consult your individual browser settings for cookies. To learn how to manage privacy and storage settings for Flash cookies, click
here
. Various browsers may also offer their own management tools for removing HTML5 local storage.
4.4 Opt-Out from the setting of cookies on your individual browser
In addition to using the user preference center, in many cases you may opt-out from the collection of non-essential device data on your web browser (see Section 4.1 above) by managing your cookies at the browser or device level. In addition, if you wish to opt-out of interest-based advertising, click
here
(or, if located in the European Union or United Kingdom, click
here
). To opt-out of targeted advertising that is provided to us and to third parties by Salesforce Audience Studio, click
here
. Please note, however, that by blocking or deleting cookies and similar technologies used on our websites, you may not be able to take full advantage of the websites.
While some internet browsers offer a “do not track” or “DNT” option that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked, these features are not yet uniform and there is no common standard adopted by industry groups, technology companies, or regulators. Therefore, we do not currently commit to responding to browsers’ DNT signals with respect to our websites. Salesforce takes privacy and meaningful choice seriously and will make efforts to continue to monitor developments around DNT browser technology and the implementation of a standard.
4.5 Social Media Features
Our websites may use social media features, such as the “Tweet” button and other sharing widgets (“Social Media Features”). Social Media Features may allow you to post information about your activities on our website to outside platforms and social networks. Social Media Features may also allow you to like or highlight information we have posted on our website or our branded social media pages. Social Media Features are either hosted by each respective platform or hosted directly on our website. To the extent the Social Media Features are hosted by the platforms themselves, and you click through to these from our websites, the platform may receive information showing that you have visited our websites. If you are logged in to your social media account, it is possible that the respective social media network can link your visit to our websites with your social media profile.
Salesforce also allows you to log in to certain of our websites using sign-in services. These services authenticate your identity and provide you the option to share certain Personal Data from these services with us such as your name and email address to pre-populate our sign-up form.
Your interactions with Social Media Features are governed by the privacy policies of the companies providing them.
4.6 Telephony log information
If you use certain features of our services on a mobile device, we may also collect telephony log information (like phone numbers, time and date of calls, duration of calls, SMS routing information and types of calls), device event information (such as crashes, system activity, hardware settings, browser language), and location information (through IP address, GPS, and other sensors that may, for example, provide us with information on nearby devices, Wi-Fi access points and cell towers).
Purpose
Description
Legal basis
Providing our websites (including our social media pages)
We process your Personal Data to operate and administer our websites and to provide you with the content you access and request
Our legitimate interest in providing online content to our customers and prospective customers regarding our service offering and related information
Improving our websites
We process your Personal Data to analyze overall trends and help us improve the user experience on our websites
Our legitimate interest in providing a relevant and well-functioning website for the benefit of our website visitors
Promoting the security of our websites
We process your Personal Data by tracking use of our websites and verifying and investigating activity
Our legitimate interest in promoting the safety and security of our websites and in protecting our rights and the rights of others
Displaying personalized advertisements and content
We process your Personal Data to conduct market research, advertise to you, provide personalized information about us on and off our websites and to provide other personalized content based upon your activities and interests
Our legitimate interest in advertising our products and services or, where necessary, to the extent you have provided your prior consent
Please see Section 10 below, to learn how you can control the processing of your Personal Data by Salesforce for personalized advertising purposes
Registering visitors
We process your Personal Data, including registration information and associated non-disclosure information, for security reasons
Our legitimate interest in protecting our offices, staff, visitors and our confidential information against unauthorized access
Managing event registrations and attendance
Managing event registrations and attendance
We process your Personal Data to plan and host events or webinars for which you have registered or that you attend, including sending related communications to you
Where you explicitly consent, we also may process your biometric Personal Data to facilitate event registration and for security reasons
Performance of a contract or where we receive your explicit consent
Ensuring the health of our visitors and employees
We process your Personal Data (which may include special categories of Personal Data) (where legally permitted) during office visits and at events during the COVID-19 pandemic to ensure the health and safety of our visitors and employees
Consent and explicit consent or in our legitimate interest to ensure the health of our employees and visitors where necessary for reasons of public interest in the area of public health
Ensuring the safety and security of our employees, events and premises
We process your Personal Data where necessary based on a credible threat to our employees, events or premises
Our legitimate interest in protecting our employees, events and premises
Sending communications
We process your Personal Data to send you marketing information, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications (e.g., marketing newsletters, telemarketing calls, SMS or push notifications, information about our products, news or events) about us, our affiliates and partners
Our legitimate interest in conducting direct marketing or where you have provided your prior consent (please see Section 10 below to learn how you can control the processing of your Personal Data by Salesforce for marketing purposes)
Recording phone calls
We process your Personal Data, including recording phone calls (in accordance with applicable laws) for training, quality assurance, and administration purposes
If required under applicable law, we will give you the option to object to a call being recorded
Consent or our legitimate interest in maintaining the high quality of our phone calls with users
Handling contact and user support requests
We process your Personal Data, if you fill out a “Contact Me” web form or request user support, or if you contact us by other means including but not limited to via phone
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in fulfilling your requests and communicating with you
Providing our services
We process your Personal Data to perform our contract with you for the provision of our services and to satisfy our obligations under the applicable terms of use
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest to provide and administer our services
Developing and optimizing the performance of the services
We process your Personal Data to
develop, optimize, and improve
the performance of the services
Legitimate interest to develop services and ensure that the services are performing in line with customer expectations; if special categories of Personal Data are processed, where the Personal Data is manifestly made public by the data subject
Providing personalized interactions
We process your Personal Data to customize our interactions with you
Legitimate interest to offer the best-in class services to our customers
Managing our customer and user accounts
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) to manage customer and user accounts generally, such as billing, customer correspondence and customer relationship management
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in the management of customer and user accounts
Managing usage and licensing compliance
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) to assess and manage usage and licensing compliance with the applicable terms of use of our services
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in managing the provision of our services to customers
Preparing internal reports and business modeling
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) for internal reporting and business modeling purposes (e.g., forecasting, revenue, capacity planning, product strategy)
Our legitimate interest in the management of our business operations
Maintaining our security
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of maintaining Salesforce’s own security, including investigating, detecting and preventing suspicious activity, fraud and cybercrime that may affect Salesforce or its services
Our legitimate interest in promoting the safety and security of Salesforce generally and to protect our rights and the rights of others
Managing compensation for employees
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of determining compensation for Salesforce employees, such as commission
Necessary for the performance of a contract with an employee or our legitimate interest in fairly compensating our employees
Undertaking financial reporting
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of financial reporting
Our legitimate interest in meeting our obligations associated with the reporting of our finances
Aggregating data
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of aggregating this information to ensure that it is no longer identifying
Our legitimate interest in minimizing the amount of Personal Data processed as part of the noted processing activity
Managing, and participating in, webinars, contests, programs, training, certifications or promotions
We process your Personal Data if you register for a webinar, contest, promotion, training, certification or a program.
In some cases where the training or certification is through your employer, we will share your we will share your Personal Data with your employer
Some webinars, contests, programs, trainings, certifications and promotions have additional rules containing information about how we will process your Personal Data
Consent, necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in providing the webinar, contest, promotion, training, certification or promotion
Managing payments
If you have provided financial information to us, we process your Personal Data to verify that information and to collect payments to the extent that doing so is necessary to complete a transaction and perform our contract with you
Necessary for the performance of a contract
Administering surveys and conducting research
We process your Personal Data (including, where legally permitted, special categories of Personal Data) in order to meet the goals set out in surveys or research as well as to analyze our compliance with internal policies
Consent or explicit consent (if required under applicable law) or our legitimate interest in conducting the survey or research based on its stated goals (where no special categories of Personal Data are in scope)
Participating in a Salesforce community, such as that focused on open-source development
We process your Personal Data, such as your username associated with your community account, in order to host and maintain the community for the benefit of its members
Our legitimate interest in hosting and maintaining such a community for the benefits of its members, as well as in order to inform you of program changes that are important to your participation or relate to additional security measures
Collecting diversity information
We process your Personal Data (including special categories of Personal Data) to the extent you voluntarily consent to provide it to meet our broader community goals related to diversity and equality of opportunity
Consent or explicit consent (if required under applicable law)
Complying with legal obligations
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) when cooperating with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with our legal obligations under applicable laws to the extent this requires the processing or disclosure of Personal Data to protect our rights
Legal obligation or our legitimate interest in protecting against misuse or abuse of our websites or services, protecting personal property or safety, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, complying with judicial proceedings, court orders or legal processes, responding to lawful requests, or for auditing purposes
If we need to collect and process Personal Data by law, or under a contract we have entered into with you, and you fail to provide the required Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to perform our contract with you.
Requests Submitted
Requests Fulfilled in Whole Or In Part*
Average Days to Respond
Average Days to Complete a Request**
Requests for access to Personal Data
44
32
1
49
Requests to delete Personal Data
210
143
1
29
Requests to correct Personal Data
4
0
1
3
Objections to processing Personal Data
7
4
1
15
Requests to opt-out of Sharing
2,064
2,064
n/A
5
*Requests may be unable to be completed due to factors like duplicate requests, the inability to verify the resident’s identity or lack of response.
**Time to complete a request may depend in part on receipt of information from the person making the request, such as information to verify the person’s identity or information about the action requested.  Data is for all requests received by the Salesforce Family Affiliates from California residents between January 1 and December 31, 2023.
Contact us